[1]              
M. is very much loved by her parents. However, her parents have been
involved in a high conflict family law proceeding, with serious allegations of family
violence and sexual abuse of the parties’ child, M., said to be perpetrated by
the applicant father. The parties do not dispute that there was family
violence, but they disagree on who the perpetrator was, and who the victim of
the violence was.
[2]              
The applicant was arrested in December 2021, on allegations of domestic violence.
The police initially laid charges against the applicant. Since the separation,
the respondent has reported approximately 50 allegations of intimate partner
violence and coercive control, not including the abuse allegations against M. The
police withdrew the charges, laying more charges after receiving a further
complaint related to incidents which allegedly occurred before the parties
separated. Those charges are still outstanding.
[3]              
Since the separation, M., who was four and a half at the time the
parties separated, has told several individuals of incidents giving rise to
allegations that the applicant sexually abused her and physically harmed her. The
Toronto Police Services (“TPS”), Children’s Aid Society (“CAS”), and the
Children and Youth Advocacy Centre (“CYAC”) all investigated the allegations.
None of the authorities or agencies involved have concluded that the applicant sexually
abused his daughter. The police did not lay charges regarding the sexual abuse
allegations.
[4]              
The applicant has not had any parenting time since the time of his
arrest, save for one supervised visit on January 31, 2023, facilitated by
virtue of a s. 30 assessment under the Children’s Law Reform Act, R.S.O.
1990, c. C.12.
[5]              
Twelve family law judges have been involved in this case; six of these
judges have made orders for the applicant to have supervised parenting time. There
have been nine court orders for parenting time for the applicant. Of the 51
supervised parenting visits scheduled, only one took place in the context of
the s. 30 assessment. The applicant brought several contempt motions, but only one
was heard on its merit and ultimately not granted, primarily because of the
record at the time.
[6]              
Costs awards have been made against the respondent for failing to comply
with the court’s orders in relation to the applicant’s parenting time and failing
to complete required paperwork required by the chosen supervising facilities. These
costs awards are still outstanding.
[7]              
The trial was set down for five days but lasted 14 days, as the trial
estimate provided by the parties was inaccurate. After the first few days of
trial, the respondent was representing herself and by the fourth day, so was
the applicant, save for the cross-examination of the respondent, completed by
the applicant’s agent, Eva Chan. With the assistance of their agents in the
background – Ms. Chan, for the applicant, and Jessica Cohen, for the respondent
– the parties were able to navigate a very difficult trial. The court extends
its thanks to both lawyers. The parties always came prepared each day and
showed a remarkable mastery of the documents and CaseLines (now Case Center).
[8]              
The applicant is seeking an immediate change of residence for M., a
minimum 90-day suspension of contact for the respondent, sole decision-making
authority, partition and sale of the matrimonial home, and other relief.
[9]              
The applicant is also seeking a publication ban and sealing of the
continuing record to protect the identity of M., who turned seven before the
trial concluded.
[10]          
The applicant father is 41 years old and is self-employed. He owns his
own business. The applicant was born in Canada and is Chinese. His family is
from Hong Kong. He currently lives with his
parents in Scarborough. He and his parents are Christian. The applicant and his
parents speak English and Cantonese.
[11]          
The respondent mother is 40 years old. She was born in Jamaica and speaks
English. The respondent is Catholic. Her father passed away in 2014. Her mother
lives in Ontario, but the two appear to have an estranged relationship. The
respondent is a university graduate and last worked as a manager in 2018. She
had an online business selling cosmetics.
[12]          
The parties met in university in 2006. They started cohabitating in or
around 2008. They married on May 21, 2011. They have one child, M., born [xx]
2017, now seven years old. M. resided with both parties from her birth until the
applicant’s arrest on December 28, 2021, discussed below.
[13]          
The respondent currently resides in the jointly owned matrimonial home
with M. and has been her sole care giver since the parties separated. M. is
homeschooled by the respondent.
[14]          
The parties jointly own the matrimonial home in the suburb of Etobicoke.
[15]          
On December 28, 2021, the parties effectively separated when a friend of
the respondent, John Zagala, contacted TPS, and the police attended at the
parties’ matrimonial home. The applicant was arrested and charged with five
counts of assault and one count of uttering a death threat against the
respondent, for incidents occurring between 2008 to 2021. Conditions were imposed
on the applicant’s release, which included a prohibition from possessing weapons,
and maintaining a distance of 200 metres from the matrimonial home.
[16]          
The applicant moved in with his parents after the arrest. He has not
returned to the matrimonial home, other than to pick up some of his belongings
afterwards while escorted by police.
[17]          
Shortly before the incident, the applicant had videotaped the child’s
sleep schedule with her mother during the day, and reportedly threatened to
call CAS due to a concern that the child was not getting enough daylight.
[18]          
A day after the applicant’s arrest, the police made a domestic violence
report to CAS. The applicant moved in with his parents. He made a report to CAS
about his concern about M. on the same day.
[19]          
The applicant commenced an Application on August 8, 2022, for
decision-making responsibility, parenting time, and corollary relief.
[20]          
On October 14, 2022, the charges against the applicant were
unconditionally withdrawn at the request of the Crown.
[21]          
Since their separation, the respondent has made additional allegations
of serious family violence said to be perpetrated by the applicant against her
and M. In February 2023, the respondent emailed TPS with 38 additional
allegations of assault, threats, and property damage, among other things.
[22]          
In March 2023, CAS received a referral that the respondent mother had
reported that M. shared with her that “Mr. Y[xx] used to use his finger to poke
her private since she was three years old.” There were other incidents reported
by the respondent mother, which she indicates that she had observed.
[23]          
In the months since the proceedings commenced, M. has made disclosure to
several professionals who had a duty to report; in accordance with their
obligation, these professionals have reported the allegations of sexual abuse
to the CAS, and CAS has, in turn, reported the allegations to the police.
[24]          
On September 15, 2023, the applicant was charged with one count of
criminal assault, which was said to have been committed in or around October
2020.
[25]          
Since the parties separated, CAS has opened and closed its file on
several different occasions. CAS re-opened the file after receiving a new referral
from individuals with a duty to report. The CAS made a “verification” that
there had been “domestic violence” shortly after the receiving the initial
referral, although they did not identify the author of the violence. CAS made
no similar verification of sexual abuse by the applicant. CAS found
inconsistencies in M.’s account.
[26]          
The applicant admits that there was family violence, but says he was the
recipient and not the author of the violence. He has consistently denied that
he sexually abused M., and says that she is being coached by the respondent. He
agreed to supervised parenting, to facilitate parenting time with M., despite
his denial that he perpetrated any violence. Since the separation in December
2021, there have been numerous court orders for supervised parenting time with
M. by the applicant. The applicant has only seen M. once in the context of a
supervised visit to facilitate a s. 30 assessment.
[27]          
Pursuant to an order of Faieta J. dated June 8, 2022, the parties
retained Dr. Kimberly Harris to complete a s. 30 assessment under the Children's
Law Reform Act. Dr. Harris concluded that there were two options available
to the family: either “a therapeutic goodbye,” or a “custody reversal” (using
the new legal terminology following the changes to the federal and provincial
legislation in 2021), this would be a reversal of primary residence of the
child and decision-making responsibility.
[28]          
The following is the position of the parties.
[29]          
The applicant father says the primary issue to be determined is parenting,
and decision-making responsibility, the conditions to be placed on parenting to
ensure M.s short term and long-term wellbeing, because of the respondent mother’s inability to support her relationship
with him.  He says that the respondent mother has mental health issues, and isolates
their daughter from everyone, including family members.
[30]          
The applicant says the matrimonial home must be sold, and an amount be repaid
to his parents, which he says was a loan for the down payment on the house.
[31]          
The applicant says that he has been the victim of domestic violence and says
there is no truth to the allegations made by the respondent. He says that the respondent
has coached their daughter to make sexual abuse allegations and has exposed her
to adult language, in furtherance of alienating him from his daughter. He says the
respondent seeks to gain an advantage in the litigation by involving the police
and child protection authorities.
[32]          
The applicant says the respondent has delayed the court process, delayed
attempts to involve professionals, impeded his ability to exercise parenting
time with his daughter, and did not co-operate with professionals except where
she stood to benefit. He says the respondent has not provided consent to M.’s
therapist providing her file or to speak to Brayden to schedule further
supervised visits. The applicant submits that the respondent’s gatekeeping and
possessiveness of M. is harmful to M. and has resulted in alienating M. from him.
 He says that the respondent will argue that she needs to protect M., but what she
has really done is made herself the trier of fact and decision maker in this
court case. Her repeated allegations are roadblocks to this court proceeding.
By refusing to obey court orders for parenting time, the applicant submits the respondent
has built walls around M. She has completely undermined the supervised
parenting visits, which would have given the court a window into his parenting
of M. and their relationship. The applicant says that in  truth, the respondent
 wants to bar the gates and pull up the drawbridge with M. protected inside the
castle, and everyone else on the outside.
[33]          
The respondent is seeking an order terminating all parenting time
between M. and the applicant father. She says that a “therapeutic goodbye” or termination
of parenting time is in M.’s best interests. The respondent says M. continues
to suffer from extreme fear of the applicant, distress, anxiety, and trauma symptoms
due to the physical, psychological, emotional, and sexual abuse perpetrated by
the applicant against her, as well as her direct and indirect exposure to the
applicant’s severe, chronic, and repetitive domestic violence and control.
[34]          
The respondent seeks an order granting her sole decision-making
responsibility, that M.’s primary residence remain with her, that the applicant
has no parenting time, a restraining order, and an order that the applicant
shall not have access to information about the child including, her health,
educational, and therapeutic records, among other relief.
[35]          
The respondent submits that she and her daughter have suffered and
experienced substantiated abuse and domestic violence at the hands of the applicant.
She says she lived in a state of constant terror because of the applicant’s
volatility, unprovoked physical violence, threats, abuse, punishments, and
restrictions/refusals for necessities. She submits that their lives, and even
daily movements, were controlled by the applicant. She submits that the
applicant’s cruelty against M. includes multiple psychological, physical, and
sexual abuses. She argues that during the relationship, the applicant financially
controlled her, and refused to allow her to work outside of the home.
[36]          
The following issues are raised in this trial:
[37]          
The request for a publication ban and sealing order are denied, for the
reasons below. Anonymization is an appropriate response to protect the privacy
of this very young child, and the names of her parents.
[38]          
There is a presumption that court proceedings are open to the public. Court
openness is protected by the constitutional entrenched guarantee of freedom of
expression and is essential to our democracy: Sherman Estate v. Donovan,
2021 SCC 25, [2021] 2 S.C.R. 75, at para. 1.
[39]          
This presumption may be limited only in exceptional circumstances where
there is a demonstrated and serious risk to an important competing public
interest: Sherman, at para. 4. Any such restrictions must be no greater
than necessary to protect the competing public interest: Sherman, at
para. 4.
[40]          
As noted by the Supreme Court of Canada in Sherman:
[41]          
In Ontario, when a request is made for a discretionary order like a sealing
order, a publication ban, or anonymization, Part V, Section F (Publication
Bans) of the Consolidated Provincial Practice Direction of the Ontario Superior
Court of Justice must be followed: Cao v. Monkhouse Law Professional
Corporation, 2021 ONSC 7894 (Div. Ct.). Under this section, a party seeking
a sealing order is required to give notice to the media as established by the
jurisprudence.
[42]          
However, the court has discretion to dispense with the requirement to
give notice.
[43]          
In Sherman, at para. 38, Kasirer J. re-cast the test for
discretionary limits on presumptive court openness as had been set out in Sierra
Club of Canada v. Canada (Minister of Finance), 2002 SCC 41, [2002] 2
S.C.R. 522:
[44]          
In the alternative of any motion or application, there are restrictions
which are utilized in the family law context to protect vulnerable children,
which includes initializing only the children’s names, or where there is a risk
that the children will be identified if their parents are identified, then initializing
the names of the parents as well. In this case, the applicant has also asked that
the name of his company be restricted to the public.
[45]          
Having heard the evidence, which includes serious allegations of sexual
abuse against a very young child, who has no voice, the court’s view is that some
restriction is necessary to prevent serious harm to M. in the future. The salutary
effects of such a restriction outweighs its deleterious effects on the open
court principle, and there is ample precedent for such orders: Foulidis v.
Foulidis, 2016 ONSC 6732, 86 R.F.L. (7th) 338, at paras. 17-18; S.M. v.
C.T., 2020 ONSC 4819, 46 R.F.L. (8th) 109, at paras. 27-28; G.S. and
K.S. v. Metroland Media Group et al., 2020 ONSC 5227, 46 R.F.L. (8th) 357,
at paras. 43-44. If the parties were seeking a parenting order under the provincial
Children’s Law Reform Act, they would have resort to s. 70 of the Act
to seek an order restricting public access to the court file, or on the
publication of information that has the effect of identifying any person
referred to in any document in the court file.
[46]          
Finally, the court adopts the rationale for the restrictions set out by Chappel
J. at paras. 7-9 of S.V.G. v. V.G., 2023 ONSC 3206, 93 R.F.L.
(8th) 77.
[47]          
The parties filed documents which were redacted (ex. CAS file, exhibits
to affidavit), without obtaining a court order to do so. The same principles
above apply to all materials filed in court. There are redactions of names of
authors of emails received, contact information, “witness” names, and individuals
who submitted reports. Especially in a case where credibility is an issue, full
disclosure and transparency of the records is critical. The fact that the
records before the court are redacted is also antithetical to the court’s open
court principle.
[48]          
Evidence at a family law trial is viva voce, unless leave is
given to file affidavits, which occurred in this case. Affidavit evidence at a
trial must comply with the rules of evidence. A deponent can only give evidence
on matters which are within their personal knowledge, just as if they were
testifying in court. The affidavit of each of the parties, which was their evidence
in chief, contained a significant amount of inadmissible evidence. For the
respondent’s part, in her reply affidavit, the respondent objected to some of
the inadmissible evidence in the applicant’s affidavit. The court has given no
weight to the hearsay or evidence that is otherwise inadmissible.
[49]          
There are other evidentiary issues related to some of the exhibits to
the affidavits. Exhibits were annexed to affidavits to prove the content of a
document, without more. There was no agreement beforehand by the parties regarding
the trial documents or exhibits, as urged by the Court of Appeal in several
decisions: Bruno v. Dacosta, 2020 ONCA 602, 69 C.C.L.T. (4th) 171, at
para. 53; Girao v. Cunningham, 2020 ONCA 260, 2 C.C.L.I. (6th) 15, at
paras. 21-35. Exhibits annexed to an affidavit is not sworn evidence: see Katz
v. Katz, 2014 ONCA 606, 50 R.F.L. (7th) 1; Sears v. Coristine, 2020
ONSC 7968.
[50]          
The parties called the following witnesses.
[51]          
In addition to himself, the applicant called the following witnesses:
[52]          
The respondent called the following witnesses, in addition to herself:
[53]          
The applicant is self-employed and owns 100 percent of a service-based
company that investigates and assesses heating and cooling issues in office
spaces. He says that the respondent may still own her cosmetic company, which
sells products online.
[54]          
The applicant was a credible witness. His evidence, for the most part,
was internally consistent. He answered questions directly. He repeatedly made
admissions that were not helpful to him. Even though he was cross-examined by
the respondent herself, he agreed with her on many questions, and at times,
offered possible explanations when he did not know the answer. He admitted,
without hesitation, that he did not disclose the mining units and
cryptocurrency to the accountant (jointly retained by the parties as a
litigation expert).
[55]          
The applicant says that after he was charged, he moved in with his
parents. On cross-examination, he testified that he had spoken to the
respondent about taking M. out more, getting some sun, going to school, playing
with the neighbourhood kids, and she refused all suggestions.
[56]          
 He was asked by the police whether there had been domestic violence,
and he told them the respondent assaulted him. On cross-examination, he
testified that the charges related to incidents which occurred years before M.
was born, and some from when she was a baby.
[57]          
He says it was the respondent who was abusive, and not him. He testified
that the respondent was often jealous and possessive from the beginning of
their relationship. She would accuse him of cheating, go through his phone
book, and take his wallet and keys when he tried to escape. She would not allow
him to spend time with his female friends. They had arguments because of her
jealousy. He would lock himself in the bathroom to get away at times, and
sometimes, she would throw herself against the door.
[58]          
After M. was born, she became the focus of much of the respondent’s controlling
behavior.
[59]          
It was only during the pandemic when the applicant was working from
home, that he noticed concerning behaviour by the respondent towards M. He tried
to address M.’s social isolation and sleep schedule and suggested that she be
placed in school. The respondent would not co-operate. He took some videos to
document the sleep and schedule and advised the respondent that he intended to call
CAS. He was arrested before he could call CAS.
[60]          
Since December 2021, he has seen his daughter only once, despite having
obtained nine court orders for supervised parenting, directing the respondent
to comply with the court’s parenting time orders and various terms of the
court’s orders to facilitate supervised parenting with him. There have been 51
failed supervised visits out of the 52 scheduled visits, between August 2022
and August 2023, and no visits have been scheduled since October 2023, as the
respondent refuses to permit M.’s therapist, Ms. Blakeley, to speak with
Brayden Supervision Centre.
[61]          
The applicant says that the respondent has made false allegations to
both the police and CAS. Since December 28, 2021, the respondent has contacted
the police numerous times, claiming to have recalled additional incidents of
abuse. The applicant testified that the respondent has falsely reported well
over 50 incidents, which the police have investigated. The initial ten charges were
unconditionally withdrawn. In February 2023, the respondent made an additional
false allegation, and he was charged. The case is still pending.
[62]          
The applicant testified that M. was able to connect with him quickly,
even after almost two years of no contact. They had had a close and loving
relationship. He was never physically abusive to the respondent. He has never deprived
them of using the bathroom or using racial slurs in her presence. He admits to
having a crossbow, which they purchased together around the time of the George
Floyd incident.
[63]          
The respondent was possessive and jealous, and the applicant testified
that he became isolated from long-time friends, and eventually his family. She
would not allow him to go to church. He did not share with his friends how bad
things were. He recalls one incident when she struck him in the face and his
glasses went flying. He was terminated from a teaching position because she insisted
on being present for each class to prevent female students from hitting on him.
He was not allowed to use social media, except for LinkedIn. In 2020, she accused
him of cheating on her and using Facebook, and he was pressured into taking a
polygraph test to prove he had been faithful.
[64]          
The applicant testified that the respondent sent a 5-page email in May
2018 to his parents before they could babysit M. He testified that the
respondent was still breastfeeding M. up until the time they separated. M. was
four and a half at the time. He testified that she was frequently late for
work, came home during the lunch break to breastfeed M., and was on the phone
with him during her commute to and from work so that she could talk to M. She
was fired from her job in mid-2018, and she then accused a colleague of pushing
her when she was pregnant. The employer eventually settled. He testified that she
insisted that he and his parents speak to M. in English and that his parents
use M’s English name. He testified that she has accused his mother of hitting
M. and this false allegation, caused his parents who were prepared to supervise
visits, not wanting to get involved.
[65]          
In mid-2021, the applicant began having concerns that the respondent was
isolating M. and was only allowing M. to go to sleep at around 7am, and then
waking her up to have “breakfast” at 7pm. He testified that M. had not seen the
sun in more than six months by the time he was removed from the matrimonial home.
After he was arrested, he called CAS the following day and reported his concern
regarding M.’s sleeping habits.
[66]          
He testified that he started taking videos of M’s sleep schedule so he could
confront the respondent and told her that he would have to report this to CAS
if she did not support him in correcting M’s sleep schedule and lack of socialization.
The respondent was very upset.
[67]          
The applicant testified that he thought about the therapeutic goodbye
and weighed that option with the way M. is being exposed to very adult subject
matters and things of that nature that are not true. He weighed the potential
short-term negative impact to M. and concluded that it would be better for her
to be in his “custody” for the interim and “through the Family Bridges Program.”
He stated that “hopefully that would help M[xx], myself and yourself, Ms. Y{xx}
to form a more healthy way of raising our daughter M. [xx}.”
[68]          
The applicant’s mother also testified at the trial. She and her husband
were born in Hong Kong, and she immigrated to Canada at the beginning at the
beginning of the 1980s. Her immediate family lives in Toronto.
[69]          
She does not believe her son abused M. In general, A.Y. was a credible
witness overall, but showed some bias towards her son.
[70]          
She is a retired nurse. She worked at a hospital in Toronto for approximately
30 years. She had also done some nursing in Hong Kong. Her husband is a chef.
Since retiring, she volunteers at the church, and has been a Sunday school
teacher. Her husband is the head of the children department, and they have
served together with a scout club for children of all grades. She and her
husband have been involved in missionary work.
[71]          
A.Y. babysat M. after the respondent returned to work after her
maternity leave. The respondent had many rules, only some of which A.Y. could
remember. She agreed that some of the respondent’s rules were the following: do
not strip her down naked, bathe her, shower her, or wash her face; do not take M.
into the bathroom or bedroom with her; no TV or cell phone; do not put the baby
on grandpa’s lap, do not speak Chinese; do not join her for dinner after
babysitting.
[72]          
She testified that if M. were to live with them, she would have her own
room and bed. She says the long-term plan is to purchase a bigger house. She
says she will look after M.’s hygiene, and the applicant already forwarded a
detailed plan.
[73]          
On cross-examination, she acknowledged signing the Meridian Credit Union
Gift Letter for a $100,000 loan from her to the applicant. She admitted that
the document stated the following:
[74]          
Dr. Kimberly Harris provided a Parenting Plan Evaluation report dated
August 18, 2023, pursuant to s. 30 of the Children’s Law Reform Act, under
the auspices of NavOn (Navigating Onward). Dr. Harris completed this s. 30 assessment
of the parties and M. pursuant to the order of Faieta J. dated June 8, 2022.
[75]          
Dr. Harris interviewed or consulted the parties, family, friends, and various
professionals involved with the family, as well as TPS, CAS, the supervising services,
and records.
[76]          
Dr. Harris was impartial and dispassionate in her testimony, as she
strove to clarify questions for each party, once they were self-represented,
and was even-handed in her testimony. It was this dispassionate approach which
prompted the court to ask her to return, on the consent of the parties, after
she had competed her evidence. The court sought answers to two questions, given
the two options in her report and following the evidence of Ms. Haroon, the
reunification therapist. The parties were afforded a further opportunity to
cross-examine her and did do so.
[77]          
Dr. Harris’ evidence is dealt with throughout the judgment.
[78]          
Dr. Harris is a registered forensic and clinical
psychologist in the province of Ontario and is the Executive Director of NavOn.
She is also an adjunct professor in the Faculty of Education and Faculty of
Social Science at Western University. At the time of the trial, she was the
co-president of the Ontario Chapter of the Association of Family and
Conciliation Courts (AFCC). She teaches, trains, and develops programs in
family assessment and family therapy, including voice of the child reports and
child inclusive mediation. She has worked with families and children since the
start of her career and has increasingly focused on families going thorough
separation and divorce. She also completes parenting assessments and parenting
capacity assessments.
[79]          
 The focus of Dr. Harris’ work is the needs of the
children and the ability of parents to meet those needs, with a secondary
component around consultation/intervention to support families experiencing a
gamut of difficult family situations. She has training and experience in family
violence. In the past few years, she has sat on the National Domestic Violence
Community of Practice.
[80]          
The court accepted Dr. Harris as an expert to provide
opinion evidence to the court in parenting, decision making, and family
violence.
[81]          
Dr. Harris testified that she set out the two stark
contrasts available for this family, and the pros and cons of each option, that
is having to choose one parent over the other. She testified that the respondent’s
“lack of co-operation with court ordered parenting time did contribute to where
we find ourselves at the end of the assessment.” She said the two options are mutually
exclusive, but made no recommendations for the decision-making and parenting
time of M.
[82]          
As Dr. Harris used language utilized before the amendments, the term she
used will be employed, where appropriate.
[83]          
The first option is a “custody reversal” (that is a change in the
primary residence of M. and decision-making responsibility). The second option
is a “therapeutic goodbye.” Dr. Harris does not believe that there is any
middle ground for this family.
[84]          
Dr. Harris was of the view that M. is likely not a victim of sexual
abuse. She noted in her report that respondent “has made repeated allegations
of child abuse, particularly sexual abuse, that have not been verified,” and that
“the reports are inconsistent and at times her accounts impressed as changing
to align with given information.” Dr. Harris testified that she views this as a
severe case of parent-child contact problems which included:
[85]          
She noted in her report that there is “significant information pointing
toward highly restrictive gatekeeping by Ms. Y[xx] which is itself harmful to
children,” and maintained this view at trial. Dr. Harris indicated that “gatekeeping
by allegation is a parent alienating behaviour.”
[86]          
Dr. Harris said the respondent set out criteria that she wanted in place,
then preceded to not co-operate with parenting time. She thought the respondent
was not participating in such a way that would allow M. any time with the
applicant father. She says showing up physically is not the same thing as
supporting the child emotionally to engage in a particular activity, event or
parenting time. She set out ways in which the respondent was not supporting M.
emotionally, or even physically, because she was little.
[87]          
Dr. Harris testified that M. has made comments inconsistent with her age
and is likely repeating what she has heard. This matches with CAS concerns regarding
memory contamination. Dr. Harris also identified that the respondent shares
information with M. which she then takes on as her truth. The respondent has
repeatedly asked M. if she wants to see her father, when at this point in M.’s
young age, it was not a choice for her. Dr. Harris was of the view that putting
the option forward was problematic for a number of reasons: it is not healthy
for her to be put into situations where they are not co-operating, and it
articulates that it is not safe.
[88]          
Dr. Harris was of the view that M. was socially isolated. When she
interviewed her, M. could not name any friends. Dr. Harris thought
homeschooling contributed to the social isolation.
[89]          
Mr. Wygant was retained by the applicant as a litigation expert. His
role was limited to analyzing the data from Dr. Harris’ report.
[90]          
Mr. Wygant has a bachelor’s degree in psychology, a Master degree in
forensic psychology and a Master degree in Clinical Psychology, and was in his
dissertation phase of his PHD Clinical Psychology program at the time of the
trial. He has a limited license to practice psychology. Since 2013, he has been
in practice as a forensic evaluator, and has worked on over 450 cases involving
domestic relations involving child custody and access, and criminal cases
assessing child abuse. He has training and experience assessing child abuse in
a scientific way.
[91]          
For the reasons set out below under the heading of “Critique Reports” within
the Analysis section, the court did not find the report of Mr. Wygant helpful
in determining the issue of parenting and decision making for M.
[92]          
Additionally, during his testimony, Mr. Wygant’s referred to articles
found in Dr. Harris’ report, which were not put to her. It is not clear the
nature of the opinion sought, the documents reviewed, what documents were
reviewed for the purpose of his report, what evidence was reviewed or
considered, and whether the authorities referred to in his report are authoritative.
The report also appears to go beyond the scope of what Mr. Wygant was retained
to do and provides opinions on a broad range of areas. It is not apparent to
the court that Mr. Wygant, who admittedly appeared to be knowledgeable about
the various subject areas he addressed, had the requisite qualification to
provide opinions on these areas.
[93]          
Mr. Wygant testified that an anxious parent can project their fear. In
his report, he noted that the research shows that anxious parents often exhibit
a cognitive bias toward threat and are more likely to engage in overprotective
behavior of their child due to a maladaptive perception of danger and increased
sensitivity to the child’s distress in response to the mother’s anxiousness. He
testified that while there is no evidence that the respondent is anxious, the
detailed email to the grandparents suggests otherwise.
[94]          
He says there is evidence to support Dr. Harris’ hypothesis that the respondent
mother is a hypervigilant mother. He indicates that the most accurate
hypothesis is that M. “is not a victim of sexual abuse, but a sincere, hypervigilant
parent inaccurately believes her child is the victim of sexual abuse.” It could
also be accurate that the mother in this case is using her allegations of
sexual abuse to manipulate the court system during the parties’ custody
litigation. He said both hypotheses can be true since “many mothers” who
present as a hypervigilant and overprotective parent will misreport sexual
abuse allegations based on a misinterpretation of conversations they had with their
child.
[95]          
According to Mr. Wygant, it is common to have source misallocation in
children in response to a question. When a child is merely asked a question once
like, “Did daddy touch your pee pee?,” the child may go on to repeat “Daddy
touch pee pee,” because the source and the attribution has been incorporated
into the child’s mind as a product of suggestion, not a product of their
personal knowledge. He suggested that because of this, a child may falsely
report experiencing something that they did not experience.
[96]          
He said that there is also evidence to support the hypothesis that the
respondent mother is using the allegation of sexual abuse to manipulate the
court system during the litigation. He pointed to the police file, the emails from
the respondent to the police, the way the respondent was amplifying and adding
facts, the way she was asking about updates to provide to her family law
lawyer, as well as the repeated focus on the various agencies’ duty to report,
a theme she repeatedly came back to with professionals (who also testified). He
said that both hypotheses can be true. He noted that the latter can even be
done without malevolence by an anxious parent, based on an innocent
misinterpretation of what a child has said.
[97]          
Mr. Wygant testified that there is no way to tell if there is impact
from domestic violence on a child without understanding what the domestic
violence was and the child’s reactions to it. He said that sometimes children
are exposed to domestic violence and there are very few or no negative
repercussions on their developmental trajectory, while others who are exposed
to very little may have extreme negative reactions.
[98]          
On cross-examination, he confirmed that being exposed to domestic
violence can have an impact on a child. He was asked about a child witnessing strangulation,
which he says was a corrupting message for a child and a form of child abuse. The
respondent put to him where “parents who try to choke the life out of you.”
which he says was not only physical abuse but also child abuse. He also noted the
presence of guns, knives, and crossbow in the home, the use of a crossbow, and the
insinuation of a verbal threat may constitute abuse.
[99]          
Ms. Haroon was jointly retained by the parties, by order of Steele J., as
a court ordered reunification therapist. She provided a report dated September
15, 2023, under the auspices of RESTORE Counselling & Family Services. The
purpose of the report was to provide a clinical intake consultation to assess
the severity of the contact difficulties, as well as the ability of the family
to follow through on any requirements for a successful reunification.
[100]       Ms.
Haroon is a registered social worker and psychotherapist with a Bachelor of
Arts, Bachelor of Social Work, and Master of Social Work. She is registered
with the Ontario College of Social Workers and Social Service Workers. She has
worked in the fields of education, child welfare, and in private practice providing
individual and family therapy. She provides various services to families experiencing
high conflict separation and divorce services including reunification therapy.
Ms. Haroon is a panel member of the Office of the Children’s Lawyer and provides
reports under s. 112 of the Courts of Justice Act, R.S.O. 1990, c. C.43, and s. 30 assessments under the Children’s Law Reform
Act. As part of her family mediation certificate, she is trained in
domestic violence.
[101]       She
was qualified as an expert in the field of reunification therapy at the
hearing.
[102]       She
agreed with Dr. Harris’ use of the term “severe gate keeping.” She does not
believe she and Dr. Harris had any significant differences in their findings.
At the time of the report, there were over 30 failed attempts at supervised
visits, which she has never seen before. She said it was unusual. She said she
has never seen a situation where parenting time in a supervised setting has not
happened.
[103]       Ms.
Haroon interviewed the parties and several other collateral sources, including
M.’s therapist, and reviewed extensive documents.
[104]       She
testified that the respondent raised safety concerns, but even when the
respondent was provided with tools to address those concerns, she was reluctant
to use them. Ms. Haroon stated that both parents must agree that reunification
therapy was in M.’s best interest. She identified several barriers to
reunification. She pointed out that that the supervising notes indicated that there
were concerns by the supervised access centres that the respondent had difficulty
following their instructions.
[105]       Ms.
Haroon testified that the applicant thought M. having a relationship with both
parents was in her best interest, while the respondent was concerned that M.’s
engaging in reunification could cause harm to her. The respondent was also of
the view that the focus of any therapy should be on M.’s healing from her
experience of abuse. Ms. Haroon noted that the respondent “cannot commit to the
provisions of the reunification therapy,” and “continues to have difficulty in
following through on what is required of her to address the parent-child
contact issues.”
[106]       Ms.
Haroon indicated in her report:
[107]       Ms.
Haroon concluded that reunification therapy was contraindicated for the
following reasons:
[108]       Ms.
Harry has been employed with the Children’s Aid Society for over two years. She
obtained a Bachelor of Social Work and was completing her Master’s.
[109]       Ms.
Harry’s evidence was based primarily on the CAS file, which was admitted as a business
record, subject to any hearsay information in the records. Ms. Harry did have a
fair recollection of some of her involvement on the file. The file was
transferred to her from her supervisor, Ms. Boodram.
[110]       On
December 29, 2021, the applicant father called CAS regarding concerns that M.
was not seeing daylight. On December 30, 2021, CAS (Ms. Boodram) contacted the
respondent to set up a safety assessment.
[111]       Ms.
Boodram spoke to M. alone on January 4, 2022. She did not disclose that she had
any issues after speaking to her. The notes do not reveal that any of the other
CAS workers had any issues speaking with M. CAS investigated into whether there
was domestic violence.
[112]       CAS
concluded a verification process in April 2022, and concluded that the
allegation of sexual abuse was not verified.
[113]       The
file was transferred to Ms. Harry in May 2022.
[114]       The
respondent raised concerns about the grandparents actively encouraging violence.
[115]       CAS
made a verification of domestic violence was made on February 15, 2022, less
than a month after another worker indicated that it was required. The file was
transferred to her from the previous worker, Ms. Boodram.
[116]       On
June 10, 2022, and June 16, 2022, Ms. Harry made phone calls to the respondent
mother to schedule a home visit. She left two voice mail messages for the
respondent mother about a visit but received no response. She reviewed the records
which indicated that the respondent mother was not content that the CAS was not
siding with her in the “custody” and “access” dispute before the court. On
cross-examination, Ms. Harry was taken to a July 2022 entry, wherein she called
the respondent and apologized for having the incorrect number, and advised her
she had sent a letter, which the respondent indicated she had not received.
[117]       During
a private visit that she had with M., Ms. Harry asked M. if she had any worries,
and M. answered that she would be taken away from her mom. She asked M. who
will take her away from her mom, and she said “my dad.” Ms. Harry said she
asked M. who told her that, and she said, “Mommy.” When she asked M., “Did
mommy tell you that,” M. said, “Yes.” Ms. Harry testified that the respondent
interrupted the conversation, and made it known afterwards that she was
recording. Ms. Harry did not consent to being recorded.
[118]       Based
on what Ms. Harry observed, she thinks M. was being coached. M. kept looking
over to the respondent. On cross-examination, she stated that she had not been
paying attention to where the respondent went in the home. Ms. Harry indicated
that a child looking for eye contact is simply looking for reassurance, but she
maintained this had been a private meeting, and M. should not even have been
able to see the respondent. She indicated that it had been made clear to the respondent
that it was a private meeting between her and M. On cross-examination, Ms.
Harry was shown a note made in December 2022, wherein the respondent asked
whether she thought she was coaching, and she responded that she could not
verify whether she was coaching or not.
[119]       Ms.
Harry testified that CAS was worried that if access did not occur, it would
have a negative impact on M.
[120]       Ms.
Harry acknowledged that she told Dr. Harris that that although CAS could not
say whether the abuse did or did not happen, they did notice some
inconsistencies in the respondent’s report. The CYAC shared that the respondent
indicated that she never witnessed anything between the applicant and M. when
the CAS initially became involved. This has changed. Ms. Harry confirmed that
she did state that witnessing the sexual abuse of your child is not something
that you would likely forget. Ms. Harry also told Dr. Harris that the
respondent impressed as only wanting the CAS involved when there were perceived
benefits to her, resulting in a lack of responsibility by her at times. Ms.
Harry also told Dr. Harris that for the most recent complaints, she called the
respondent and left a couple of messages, with no responses. Ms. Harry then
proceeded with an unannounced visit, and the respondent said she did not
receive any messages. A visit was scheduled. She told Dr. Harris that M. was
attached to her mom, but that it was interesting that she had no problem with
the babysitter.
[121]       Ms.
Harry said she also told Dr. Harris that in the past, the respondent has
demonstrated some controlling behaviour, such as wanting to review her notes. CAS
observed that if the respondent wanted M. to do something, she would do it.
[122]       Ms.
Harry told Dr. Harris that there would likely be another allegation, since when
CAS closes the file, it is in the respondent’s interest to have the file opened
because then it appears that the applicant is under investigation. It allows her
to control the narrative in a way.
[123]       Ms.
Harry testified that she told Dr. Harris that CAS recommended that the
respondent seek support; she testified that the respondent indicated that she
did not need support, but was focused on M., indicated that when M. is healed
there would be positive impacts to her as well.
[124]       On
cross-examination, Ms. Harry indicated that CAS identified M. as being at risk
of maltreatment, which is a risk of mental/emotional harm. There was a concern
about domestic violence. Ms. Harry testified that CAS concluded during their
visit that M. was happy, healthy, and attached to her mother. There were
numerous questions put to Ms. Harry during her cross-examination which would
require opinion evidence and were otherwise not admissible.
[125]       Ms.
Kutlesa was one of the parenting time supervisors with Brayden Supervision
Services for the applicant's parenting time. Brayden is not generally given a
history about the case.  Brayden’s notes were admitted as business records,
subject to the same qualification as those from CAS with respect to hearsay information.
Ms. Kutlesa testified that Brayden is a neutral third party.
[126]       Ms.
Kutlesa has been a supervisor with Brayden since 2017. She has performed both
the role of parenting time supervisor in a Supervised Parenting Time capacity
and the role of parenting time supervisor in a Supportive Parenting Time
capacity. She has a degree in sociology from York University and a Diploma in
Social Service work from Humber College.
[127]       Between
2006 to 2011, she worked with at the Griffin Centre with children at a mental
health agency and has been with Brayden since 2017. She worked with children
ranging in age from 7 to 21. Some of the children at the Griffin Centre had
been exposed to domestic violence, trauma, neglect, and abuse, and some had CAS
involvement. She has no formal training in domestic violence. She has taken some
courses in domestic violence, and her work was done through the framework of
“trauma informed care.”
[128]       Ms.
Kutlesa testified that she reviewed her notes of her parenting visits.
[129]       On
cross-examination, the respondent repeatedly put questions to Ms. Kutlesa to
elicit opinion evidence, without any report or any indication that she was
qualified to offer the opinion. The questions related to the following: the behaviour
of children experiencing domestic violence; whether children who have
experienced violence and trauma develop a fear of separation from their primary
caregiver; whether children who experience abuse are less interested in playing
with others and playing; whether “children in that population” may be easily
startled; and whether “that population avoids activities, places or people
associated with the trauma.”
[130]       Ms.
Kutlesa repeatedly stated that she was there to ensure M.’s safety and to
support her, which were her main goals. She was there if M. felt scared or
unsafe. On cross-examination, she testified that the supervisor may facilitate
the visit but does not force a child to go in.
[131]       On
cross-examination, Ms. Kutlesa acknowledged that children in the age range of 3
to 5 who have experienced domestic violence or trauma cling to their mother or
attachment figure as a common trauma symptom. She acknowledged observing M.
cling to the respondent during the visits that she supervised, that M.
demonstrated avoidant behaviour, and she agreed that children may be become
upset if faced with something or a situation that reminded them of the
violence.
[132]       The
court gives little weight to much of Ms. Kutlesa’s opinion evidence. She provided
no report. It is not clear from her qualifications that she could provide opinion
on domestic violence, coercive control, and whether the behaviour exhibited by
M. was “trauma symptom avoidant behaviour,” among other opinions sought from
her. The respondent also attempted to put articles and statistics in articles
to Ms. Kutlesa, including an article published in The Journal of Interpersonal
Violence. Ms. Kutlesa was not aware of the article and had no off-hand
knowledge of the Journal.
[133]       Ms.
Kutlesa testified that at the initial supervised parenting time visit, M.
repeatedly stated: “I don’t feel safe with my dad - he hurt me once and I don’t
feel safe.” She testified that M. had a normal affect when she made the
statement, and she did not appear happy, sad, or upset. Ms. Kutlesa likened M.’s
affect to her saying “Hi, how are you.” Ms. Kutlesa’s observation was that M.
did not appear to be afraid at any point. Ms. Kutlesa’s agreed that M. would
say the same phrase repeatedly, throughout different visits. On cross-examination,
Ms. Kutlesa agreed that M. told her that her father hurt her, but she did not
expand. Ms. Kutlesa agreed that domestic violence is traumatic to a young
child.
[134]       Ms.
Kutlesa testified readily that the applicant father was “very cooperative, very
pleasant, and very compliant with everything that was asked.” With respect to
the respondent mother, after pausing, Ms. Kutlesa stated: “She – I wouldn’t say
that she was uncooperative, but – how should I put it – maybe a little bit more
directive, may be, needed to be towards M[xxx].”
[135]       Ms.
Kutlesa testified that different strategies were attempted to facilitate the
supervised visits with the applicant father. At one visit, she suggested to the
respondent that she take M. by the hand and just bring her in, but she
testified that the respondent mother “says that she was trying but that M[xxx]
does not like that type of touch so it is very hard to do so.” She testified
that after the visit ended, she watched the respondent mother take M.’s hand
and they walked back to the car, and they drove away. When Ms. Kutlesa was asked
if M. had the response that the respondent mother had described when the
respondent mother took her hand, Ms. Kutlessa responded: “No, she just took her
hand like a child would take a mother’s hand.”
[136]       Ms.
Kutlesa testified that does not believe she had ever seen a case where a parent
could not guide a child of M.’s age into the Centre.
[137]       There
are other instances in the Brayden notes which mention the respondent mother
and M. holding hands, but with no mention of the response that the respondent
mother says M. mentions. Some examples are as follows:
[138]       Ms.
Mangos has been employed with Brayden since 2019. She is one of the Service Directors
and carries out supervised visits. She had two visits with M. The first was the
visit with Dr. Harris, and she also had a subsequent visit.
[139]       Ms.
Mangos was a child and youth work and has worked in the field of mental health
for 25 years. She has worked with children who have experienced trauma and
domestic violence. She agreed that domestic violence can result in trauma. She
was the supervisor for the January 31, 2023, visit with Dr. Harris. On cross-examination,
she agreed that the respondent mother complied with Brayden’s directions. She
noted that the respondent “said the right words and encouraged her.”. She went
on to add: “Yes, so there wasn’t anything that you didn’t do that you weren’t
supposed to.” She agreed that the respondent attended every visit.
[140]       Ms.
Mangos was not presented as a witness to provide an opinion on coercive
control, though she was asked several questions on this area. She did not know
what the term meant, and the respondent explained the term to her.
[141]       On
cross-examination, Ms. Mangos indicated that as the service director, she was
aware of the domestic violence history with the parties. She was aware that CAS
had verified domestic violence. She was aware that CAS had verified that M. had
been exposed to domestic violence. Ms. Mangos was asked several questions on
domestic violence and child abuse. She was not called to testify to provide opinion
evidence on domestic violence and the impact on children, and several questions
elicited a response of: “I don’t know that she was having that experience,” or
similar responses along those lines.
[142]       Elsewhere
in her testimony, Mr. Mangos indicated that the supervisors were not therapist,
but they could contact a child’s therapist. In this case, she was asked whether
she recalled speaking to M.’s therapist, Ms. Blakely, before allowing any more
supervised visits. She testified that the request was sent to the respondent by
email to speak to Ms. Blakely before any more supervised visits; the Brayden
supervisors would follow the direction of the therapist. Ms. Mangos testified
that Brayden works as a team, and their goal was to help M. to try to
facilitate the visits. She testified that it would have been helpful to obtain
the techniques and recommendations from the therapist and they would have followed
those directions. The applicant provided his consent for Brayden to contact Ms.
Blakely; the respondent did not.
[143]       Ms.
Mangos testified that clients agree to the visit details and usually comply
with the agreement. She testified that the applicant father was very compliant
and followed all the directions, “and even when we changed the plans throughout
the weeks, we did not have any issues.” She indicated that one of those changes
was asking the applicant father to park his car out of view, when the
respondent mother indicated that it was “a trigger” for M. The respondent
mother attended the visits on time, but Ms. Mangos testified that “we just had
to have M. in for the visits to begin.” Ms. Mangos said the supervised visits
never began, as they were unable to get M. in the building to start them.
[144]       Ms.
Mangos testified that one of the strategies suggested was for the respondent mother
to piggyback M., because the “hand holding” did not work, and M. was “quite
playful.” M. was receptive to the piggyback ride, and she was laughing. The
respondent said no because M. was too heavy.
[145]       All
the supervised visits failed, save for the visit which occurred with Dr.
Harris. Ms. Mangos said that when she took over, there were two visits a week
from June until the end of August. She testified that she had never dealt with
this many failed supervised visits before.
[146]       Ms.
Mangos described the visit with Dr. Harris on January 31, 2023, based on her
notes. Ms. Mangos testified that she was present for the meeting, which started
off with the applicant father being on video, and Dr. Harris and Ms. Mangos in
a room with M. The respondent mother was sitting on the couch with M. They
encouraged the respondent to leave the room. The applicant father had indicated
during the video call that he had made cheesecake, which was M.’s favourite.
Dr. Harris suggested that they try a slice and offered some to the respondent
mother, who declined. At some point, M. wanted to make sure the respondent
mother also had a piece of cake.
[147]       Ms.
Mangos testified her notes indicate that “Dr. Harris and M[xxx] then, they did bunny
hops going up the hallway to the reception area to give you the cheesecake, and
then they returned to the room….and you were on the video call the entire time
eating. And it started to open up the conversations.” Ms. Mangos went on to
testify:
[148]       On
cross-examination, Ms. Mangos agreed that the respondent mother was a
comforting source for M. at the visit; she was sitting on the couch with her. Ms.
Mangos agreed that she told Dr. Harris that it was typical for M. to say that
the applicant father hurt her and that it was typical for M. to say that the
respondent hurt her feelings. Ms. Mangos’ evidence is that at no point during
the video call on January 31, 2023, did M. repeat any of the statements that
she had previously stated; specifically, M. did not say that she did not feel
safe, that her dad hurt her, or that she did not want to see her dad, nor did
she indicate that she was scared or distressed. Ms. Mangos testified that M. did
not make any such statements when the meeting changed from video to in person
with the applicant father, and that M. also did not make those statements when
Dr. Harris left the room.
[149]       Based
on the notes, Ms. Mangos testified that she estimated that it probably took
fifteen minutes for M. to warm to her father, by which time he and her were
sitting on the floor together.  Ms. Mangos says that at the end of the visit,
M. allowed the applicant father to help her put on her jacket and her boots,
and she also gave him a “high five,” which was unprompted by either her or Dr.
Harris. Ms. Mangos testified that there was no change in M.’s persona, and she
allowed the applicant father to do that. Ms. Mangos testified that M. did not
appear to be scared or in distress.
[150]       Ms.
Mangos has a duty to report and did report to the CAS. Ms. Mangos contacted the
CAS on a few occasions for a consult, when M. had reported that the applicant
had scratched her inner thigh. The CAS indicated that they were not going to
investigate further. Brayden was given the “go-ahead” for the next parenting
time visit.
[151]       Ms.
Mangos described M. as an “active,” “very friendly,” and “pleasant little girl.”
She noted that M. was “running around.” She stated that “she had an active
imagination,” and during one of her visits, M. talked about “butterflies and
things to do with nature.” Ms. Mangos testified that M. made it clear that she
did not want to attend the visits.
[152]       Ms.
Mangos testified that she was the supervisor for the June 9, 2023, visit where
she noted that M. was running around outside, doing laps, and dancing and
moving around “like a normal child.” Ms. Mangos clarified that “normal child”
meant M. had been engaged in the regular childhood activity of running and
skipping.
[153]       Ms.
Mangos acknowledged telling Dr. Harris that they tried every conceivable
strategy to facilitate the visits, and that the reason M. did not want to see the
applicant was that she felt unsafe, and it did not matter which supervisor was
there. Ms. Mangos told Harris that it was always the same routine: the
supervisors asked a question or made a suggestion, and then M. stared at the
respondent mother because she did not know how to answer or whether to comply
with the suggestions. Ms. Mangos also told Dr.
Harris that they noticed M. saying word-for-word
what the respondent mother says.
[154]        Ms.
Mangos agreed that she provided the following information to Ms. Harris, which
appears in her report:
[155]       Ms.
Ilieva was the supervisor for certain visits which took place between June 2023
to August 2023. She has been at Brayden since 2019 and is a supervisor at the
Centre. She is a registered psychotherapist and has training in counselling
psychology. She does some work in private practice and is also a program
manager for the Ministry of the Solicitor General.
[156]       At
the first visit, Ms. Ilieva atempted to speak with M. who was
responding without looking at her; she testified that M. was looking at the
respondent mother when she was speaking with her. Ms. Ilieva thought the
respondent could be firmer. The respondent mother told her that M. had issues
with physical touch. Ms. Ilieva testified that she was not able to hear if
there was an exchange between M. and her mother as they were walking away, but M.
held her mother’s hand, and it did not seem that she was pulling away.
[157]       At a June 2023 visit, the respondent was outside the building with M.,
texting the supervisor to advise that “M[xxx] was scared because father had
hurt her.” Ms. Ilieva testified that the respondent advised the supervisor that
M. had stated that her “father had stopped her feelings, and had hurt her, and
she feels scared of him.” When Ms. Ilieva went outside, M. kept repeating that
“she felt scared, hurt and, grumpy, and that father hurts her physically and
emotionally and did not allow her to feel her feelings, and hurt her feelings.”
Ms. Ilieva testified that M. kept repeating these words.
[158]       When asked if M. used “similar language” at the visits, Ms. Ilieva responded:
“It was the exact same language, I think.” Ms. Ilieva could not recall M.’s facial
expressions changing. She said: “She wasn’t crying, or looking down or anything,
she just kept repeating those words.”
[159]       At a visit in August 2023, the applicant father wrote a letter for
M. to be read by the supervisor to her. Ms. Ilieva had confirmed with the
Service Director that it was something the applicant father could share. The
letter read:
[160]       Ms. Ilieva testified that she told M. she had a letter from the father
to read to her. M. looked at the respondent and started to shake her head,
saying “No,” and that she did not want to hear it. She showed the respondent
the letter, and the respondent indicated that she did not want it read to M.,
as it would scare her to know that her father knows these things. Ms. Ilieva
testified that the respondent was concerned how he knew M. was good and math
and was writing full sentences.
[161]       Ms. Ilieva suggested that she read part of the letter, just a few
sentences in which the applicant father tells M. how proud he is of her, and
how much he loves her, and the respondent said no to the suggestion. The
respondent refused to have the letter read to M., even after the suggestion
that the letter be modified.
[162]        Ms. Ilieva testified that around 1:30, when she told M. it was time
to go home, her eyes opened wide, and she said: “But I have’[sic] told
you about my feelings yet.” Ms. Ilieva asked M., “What about your feelings?” M.
responded: “I have to say that daddy hurt me, and he hurt my feelings.”
[163]       Ms. Ilieva testified that in the 2000 visits that she has completed,
she has never had this many failed visits before.
[164]       She testified that as a supervisor, they do not receive background
information, but are notified about any restrictions about contact between
individuals. On cross-examination, the respondent attempted to obtain Ms. Ilieva’s
opinion on the effects of domestic violence and trauma. Ms. Illieva testified
that it was not her role at Brayden to provide any professional opinion. She
had some knowledge of domestic violence and trauma, and no specific knowledge
with respect to children. She was also asked whether she had knowledge about
anxiety and coercive control.
[165]       The respondent also sought to put Ms. Ilieva questions about an
article is authored by Alytia Levendosky and others, entitled “Trauma Symptoms
in Pre-School Aged Symptoms exposed to Domestic Violence.” Ms. Ilieva testified
that she was not aware of the authors or the article. Again, like the other
supervisors, she had not prepared any report. Any opinion she could offer the
court as to the causal connection between M.’s responses and trauma would
require a report, and a determination that she was qualified to provide that
opinion. None of those factors existed here. Ms. Ilieva herself testified that
she was able to indicate what she observed but was not able to provide an
opinion as to whether M.’s behaviour (not wanting to come inside the building)
was “avoidant behaviour.”
[166]       On cross-examination, Ms. Ilieva agreed that M. told her that she
did not want to go inside, and that she did not want to see her father. She indicated
that M. has stated that she was fearful of seeing her father. She indicated
that she could not provide an opinion on M.s’ response but agreed in a general
sense that M.’s responses could be a response to experience of domestic
violence. Ms. Ilieva agreed that expression of fear could be a response to
domestic violence. She agreed that being hurt physically and emotionally could
be considered abuse. She agreed that the respondent was a source of comfort to
M.
[167]       Ms.
Atcha has been a parenting supervising coordinator with Renew since 2021. She was
trained in England and has an Early Childhood Education Certificate. She has specialized
in children with special needs, up to the age of twelve years old. She had been
a supervisor at a daycare for many years.
[168]       She
completed approximately six supervising visits with M. None of them were
successful.
[169]       The
first visit was on August 19, 2022. The visit started at 1:00pm and the
respondent arrived at 1:57pm and parked her car. The respondent arrived late
for the second visit. At the third visit, M. was on the respondent’s lap and
was smiling and whispering to her mom. She wanted to go on the rides with her
mom. Ms. Atcha testified that the respondent did not struggle to pick up M.,
because M. was “generally on her lap a lot.”
[170]       Ms.
Atcha testified that at the third visit, the respondent advised that M. cried
before the visit and was upset. Ms. Atcha assured the respondent that M. seemed
happy now and seemed interested in the rides. She testified that the respondent
then looked at M. and said, “How do you feel? Why do not want to see your dad?”
Ms. Atcha testified that M. then looked at her mother and started to whisper in
her mother’s ear. The respondent told M. to tell the supervisor why she did not
want to see her dad. M. said to Ms. Atcha, “he hurts me.” Ms. Atcha testified
that after she assured M. that she is safe, the respondent apparently took deep
breath and rolled her eyes. The respondent then asked M. if she wanted to sit
on her lap, tried to get her on a chair to help with the transition, and then
M. sat on the respondent’s lap. Ms. Atcha observed that they talked to each
other, but that she could not hear what they were saying.
[171]       At
the August 29th visit, the respondent arrived almost thirty minutes late. The respondent ignored Ms. Atcha’s directions on how to make the
transition easier. The respondent expressed concern about what was in Ms.
Atcha’s documentation and challenged the Ms. Atcha about her notes and the
recording of the time. Despite being late, the respondent remained at the session and had M. on her lap,
although directed to allow M. to sit on a chair. The respondent got angry after
she requested a receipt from the coffee shop to check the time. The notes
indicate:
[172]       Ms.
Atcha said it generally takes two visits for a child to warm up, with gradual
increments of time. She said the first meeting is always difficult for the child
and the parent. She agreed it would be unusual for a child to warm up in 15 minutes
to a parent that they have not seen in over a year and a half.
[173]       By
order dated October 23, 2023, Czutrin J. directed that the parties retain a
certified business valuator to complete a business valuation for the
applicant’s business and determine the applicant’s income.
[174]       The
parties jointly retained Mr. Krofchick, who is a certified management
accountant, is also now a CPA. Mr. Krofchick prepared a Fair Market Value report
of the company and an income determination report. He has a certification from
the Charters Business Evaluators, a certification in management consultancy and
has a designation in financial forensics from the American Institute of
Accountants. Mr. Krofchick was accepted by the court as a business evaluation
and income evaluation expert.
[175]       Mr.
Krofchick testified that the value of the assets of the company is
approximately $382,000, but the biggest amount is a shareholder loan of $185,000
that the applicant owes the company. In the result, subtracting the loan, the
assets are about $200,000, and his liabilities are approximately $258,000. Mr.
Krofchick valued the company at $123,000.
[176]       Mr.
Krofchick testified that the applicant’s income for 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, and
2023, was $138,756, $131,081, $52, 325, $74,613 and $40,000, respectively. The
only correction he had to his report was the correction of a typo as to one of
the years.
[177]       Mr.
Krofchick provided alternative scenarios for the applicant income, were the
court to decide that respondent did not receive $16,000 in Research and
Development funds each year. While the court need not determine the issue for
the purpose of determining the quantum of support, Mr. Krofchick testified that
there was no change in the applicant’s income for 2021 and 2023. Under the
alternative scenario, the applicant’s income would decrease. There is some
evidence before the court to infer that the respondent received an income from
the applicant’s company based on her own tax documents filed with Canada
Revenue Agency, though she maintains that she was not paid for her services.
[178]       On
cross-examination, Mr. Krofchick was asked questions, which were based on
hypotheticals not proven at trial. For example, he was asked about the fact that
the applicant had “substantial income from cryptocurrency.” Mr. Krofchick
testified that cryptocurrency is a stock, which fluctuates in value, and only
when it is sold does it generate income. He was not told by the applicant that
he had cryptocurrency.
[179]       The
respondent testified that her “relationship was plagued with psychological,
emotional, physical, and economic abuse and confinement.” She said there were also
“multiple psychological, physical, and sexual abuses” of M. She deposed: “like
M., I am a survivor of domestic violence perpetrated by [the respondent].” The
respondent indicated that “[the applicant’s] violence has been chronic; it has
been insidious; and, it has been ongoing for many years.” The respondent
testified that the applicant removed the batteries from her car, “controlled
food,” “stopped electricity to the house,” and prevented M. from getting baths.
[180]       The
respondent said that the applicant was arrested for domestic violence and charged
with criminal assaults related to a strangulation and physical assault while M.
was present. She said that her friend, Mr. Zagala, contacted the police on
December 28, 2021. She said she had a discussion with Mr. Zagala, “and it was
agreed that the police were required for the situation. It was very dangerous,
and it was agreed that the police needed to be called.” There is currently a no-contact
order in place, and an order that the applicant not come within five hundred
metres. The respondent said that there is still an active charge against the
applicant and there is a credible witness corroborating the events.
[181]       The
respondent said the applicant’s violence towards M. started even before she was
born. She described that in 2017, when she was eight months pregnant, in a fit
of anger, the applicant threw a series of “solid wood drawers” from a wood
dresser towards her abdomen, causing her to hide in a closet. She testified
that his actions also included weapons threats, including with crossbows that
he purchased which were kept in an open area, and fired in the apartment. In
her affidavit, the respondent deposed that there were two strangulations
between 2006 and 2010. At trial, the respondent said that the applicant
strangled her on multiple occasions. She testified that he had threatened to
kill them if she wanted to leave the relationship. She deposed that the
applicant separated her from her friends and her family.
[182]       The respondent testified that neither she nor M. were permitted to
sit or stand without the applicant’s permission, and if they did, “he would
hurl violence.” The isolation occurred over time, to the point where there were
very few people that she could contact. At trial, the respondent
testified that the applicant’s violence “escalated around December 2021,” and that
it “escalated towards M. at a frightening and rapid frequency.”
[183]       She
testified that the applicant “chokes M[xxx], and I witnessed him do it. I saw
him wrap his arms across her neck, and squeeze, until she was red in the face,
and her eyebrows furrowed, and gasping for air.” She said it was “life
threatening and terrifying.” She said she witnessed the applicant “shoving
M[xxx]” and has seen him denying her a bath “for three consecutive days.” At
the trial, she testified that the applicant used the “n” word to refer to his
daughter.
[184]       She
testified that the night after the applicant was arrested was “the first night
in years” that M. was not woken up to violence, including having her blanket
ripped off or furniture being thrown around the house.
[185]       She testified that she has been told that there was spyware on her
computer, and she suspects that it was the applicant who placed it there. She
and M. are both in therapy. M. has nightmares and wakes up screaming.  M. disclosed that the applicant sexually abused her and used his
finger and “stopped her from feeling her feelings.”
[186]       The
respondent says that the grandparents, the applicant’s parents, are strangers
to M. and threatened corporeal punishment. The respondent testified that she witnessed
the grandmother hitting M. when she was two years old.
[187]       On
cross-examination, the respondent admitted that she told the police on June 22,
2022, that they were going to court soon, and she only wanted the applicant to
have supervised access.
[188]       Both
parties have made allegations of serious intimate partner violence. The
respondent has alleged family violence, coercive control, and sexual abuse of
M. The court finds that there was family and intimate partner violence between
the parties. Family violence affects not only the individuals and their
immediate family, but also society.
[189]       Both
parties were involved in a relationship plagued by jealousy. Determining who
was the actual perpetrator is a difficult task. The credibility of the parties
must be assessed in the context of the family violence. In Barendregt v.
Grebliunas, 2022 SCC 22, 66 B.C.L.R. (6th) 1, at paras. 144-145,
Canada’s highest court recently acknowledged that “family violence often takes
place behind closed doors and may lack corroborating evidence,” that it is “notoriously
difficult to prove,” and that “most family violence goes unreported.” The
respondent has alleged repeated physical, psychological, and sexual abuse, as
well as threats and intimidation by the applicant during their relationship.
The respondent has also alleged social isolation, coercive control, and
financial control.
[190]       Traditional
methods of determining credibility are inadequate to assist the court in
deciding whether a witness or the evidence is credible where family violence involved,
as there is a danger of incorporating myths and stereotypes into the assessment.
Victims of family violence often suffer from significant trauma associated with
the abuse, which may affect their ability to provide a detailed, consistent,
and accurate recollection and timeline of the events in question: K.K. v.
M.M., 2021 ONSC 3975, aff’d 2022 ONCA 72. There are social and legal
barriers which may affect the disclosure of family violence, and any delay in disclosing
its existence does not diminish its seriousness: Barendregt, at para. 183.
[191]       In
this case, the court accepts that there was family violence, and accepts the
applicant’s evidence as more credible that it was historical and that it was
the respondent who was the instigator. There is evidence to support the
applicant’s testimony that the respondent shifted her possessiveness towards
their daughter. Several professionals have referred to the respondent’s
restrictive gate keeping. For example, Dr. Harris labelled it “highly
restrictive gate keeping.” In the result, the respondent’s evidence that she has
directly observed the applicant’s repeated sexual abuse of M. is not plausible,
as there were signs of hypervigilance towards M. and restrictive gate keeping, as
evidenced by the Rules, Appendix C, for babysitting, which she gave to the
grandparents.
[192]        The respondent has also provided inconsistent stories,
initially telling the CYAC that she did not directly witness any sexual
behaviour between the applicant and M., and then later saying that she did. The
respondent described countless incidents which she said she witnessed. Dr.
Harris noted that the respondent was “deeply concerned” because “it implicates
her in the alleged abuse in terms of a disturbing failure to protect her child.”
In her report, Dr. Harris indicated: “It is impossible for me to say that there
is no risk for Mr. Y[xx] as assessment is not an exact science. I can only
offer that in my opinion based on the available information, the risk is likely
low that he sexually abused M[xx]”. In yet a third version of the story, the
respondent gave the reunification therapist a different timeline. Ms. Haroon
noted in her report:
[193]       The
respondent said that she was isolated from her friends, and that the applicant would
change the password on her phone; however, her friend, Mr. Krause, says they
texted and spoke weekly.
[194]       As
noted, the respondent provided different versions of events for certain sexual
abuse incidents which she says she observed. Ms. Haroon noted
in her report:
[195]       The
evidence indicates that well before these proceedings, it was the respondent
who had set out rigid rules for M.’s grandparents to follow, which dictated in meticulous and minute detail, the “do’s”
and “don’ts” in caring for M. The rules even prohibited the grandparents from having
visitors in their own home or taking M. outside. There were a number of
tasks relating to dressing and undressing M. A portion of the list reads:
[196]      
There are many inconsistencies in the respondent’s evidence about the
applicant’s sexual abuse of M., her attempt to control the notes of
professionals, and her asking professionals to “advocate” on behalf of M.
[197]       On June 14, 2023, M. disclosed to Ms. Blakeley that her father hurt
her arm and leg “approximately 3 years ago.” M. would have been four years and
three months at the time the disclosure was made, making her approximately one
year old at the time of the incident.[i]
M. has repeated variation of this story to others with a duty to disclose, as
in the case of Ms. Blakeley, who disclosed the incident to CAS.
[198]       The applicant was arrested December 28, 2021. The respondent deposed
in her affidavit that he “blew up at her.” At trial, the respondent testified
that his “violence escalated” that day. On cross-examination, she admitted that
she there was no “physical violence.” She deposed in her affidavit that “in or
around October 2022, [the applicant] strangled/choked M[xxx] while ‘playing
fort’.” This incident would have occurred ten months after he was out of the
matrimonial home. In addition, the respondent has given different versions of
this incident and when it took place. For instance, at trial, she testified
that she believes M. disclosed to her that the applicant father hurt her neck
in either the winter in 2021 or 2022, and that the incident occurred in the
fall of 2021. She has given different versions of the incident involving M. and
her neck and has described it as playing with her dad as opposed to be choked.
[199]       At
the trial, the respondent appeared to be reading from a document during her warmup.
On cross-examination, she repeatedly sidestepped answering many questions,
offering commentary, or providing an answer that was not responsive to the questions,
even for the most innocuous questions. For example, she was asked, “Was Juanita
Valencia ever your lawyer?” She was asked various permutations of the same question
but directed counsel to ask the question in a different way, answering only
when she was satisfied with the question. Early on in her cross-examination, the
respondent repeatedly asked for documents to refresh her memory to answer a question
before the court insisted that she allow the applicant’s agent to control the
questioning.
[200]       Another
method of answering questions was the tendency of the respondent to respond to
a question with a statement like, “I believe this is addressed in my affidavit,”
or “refer to the evidence of others,” providing commentary or other extraneous
information. The court’s view is that this was a refusal to answer a question. An
example of such an exchange between the respondent and the agent for the
applicant was as follows:
[201]       In
S.V.G. v. V.G., at paras. 103-105,
Chappel J. exhaustively sets out the factors that the court should consider in
assessing credibility in the context of family violence. She indicated that courts
must meticulously assess the evidence in its totality to ensure that family
violence claims are credible and are not being maliciously advanced to obtain a
litigation advantage: Wilson v. Sinclair, 2022 ONSC 2154; W.A.C. v.
C.V.F., 2022 ONSC 2539, at para. 397; Bandyopadhyay v. Chakraborty,
2021 ONSC 5943; Kinsella v. Mills, 2020 ONSC 4785; A.E. v. A.E., 2021 ONSC 8189, at paras. 276-281; Lee v. Eckenswiller,
2021 ONSC 6519, at paras. 27-29.
[202]        In
assessing the evidence in its totality, the Chronology at Appendix A,
incorporated by reference, is also instructive, as it indicates a pattern
whereby the respondent, or others whom she directed, would contact authorities
as events were happening in the family law proceeding.
[203]       Ms.
Mestanza and the respondent are grade school friends. They met in grade six.
[204]       There
were aspects of Ms. Mestanza’s evidence which the court found credible, and
other parts of her evidence which the court found was not credible. She lost
touch with the respondent after the respondent and the applicant got together. She
testified that it was harder to get a hold of the respondent. She called her a
few times, and at times the applicant picked up, and indicated that the
respondent was not available. On cross-examination, she testified that it was
probably two or three instances when the applicant answered the phone, and this
occurred before the parties were married. She attended their wedding. She
testified that the respondent was crying at the wedding because she had
forgotten cufflinks and shoes and the applicant was upset.
[205]       She
testified that the applicant told the respondent she had to be at arm’s reach;
she was not permitted to pick up her daughter. When the respondent’s father
passed away, she was not allowed to attend his funeral or visit his grave. The
applicant was “always throwing furniture” at the respondent. Ms. Mestanza
testified that the respondent also told her that when she and M. went out, the
applicant would follow them to see what they were doing and search her Google
history. On cross-examination, Ms. Mestanza testified that the last time she
saw the applicant was at the parties’ wedding, which was also the last time she
saw the parties together. She has never seen the applicant and M. together.
[206]       Ms.
Mestanza testified that when she was in labour, the respondent called and told
her that the applicant had strangled her in front of M., and that they were
hiding in a room. Ms. Mestanza admitted to telling Dr. Harris that she told the
respondent to call the police, but then heard the respondent apologizing to the
applicant, and then the phone was cut off.  At trial, she says she tried
calling back and texted, but did not get through. She also texted the following
day. She says she reported the incident two years later in the fall of 2022 and
she went to the police station to make the report.
[207]       On cross-examination, she testified that she and the respondent
texted each other on a weekly basis before the parties separated; after the
separation, the frequency increased to every other day.
[208]       Ms.
Nady and the respondent met in 2002 at university. They remained friends after
university. She went to the parties’ wedding in 2011. She now lives in the United
States.
[209]       There
are problems with Ms. Nady’s affidavit, which includes evidence that is not in
her personal knowledge, and to the extent that she is the recipient of statements,
does not identify the source of the information, or make any conclusion about
things she observed or heard.
[210]       At
the trial, Ms. Nady demonstrated that she was not an impartial witness by
making statements and offering to provide “opinion evidence” to the court. During
the course of the warmup questions, the respondent sought to elicit opinion
evidence from her. Specifically, the respondent tried to get Ms. Nady to
comment on “the importance of recognizing partner abuse and the effects on a
child,” her opinion on what a “healthy parent child relationship” looks like,
or her opinion on the ultimate  question for the court to decide, that is, what
is in the best interest of M. Ms. Nady made claims like, “Children and their
safety should be prioritize, should be the focus for parents and everyone.” When
the court was ruling that Ms. Nady could not provide opinion evidence, she interjected
to seek leave to permit her to “speak as a non-expert mother.” She said: “I
also have children and my observations when is spoke to [the respondent] about
how the behaviour is towards the child.”
[211]       There
were numerous inconsistencies in Ms. Nady’s evidence, some of which conflicted
with what she told Dr. Harris, and some of which is conflicting by virtue of
implausibility.
[212]       Ms.
Nady’s qualification was not elicited for the court. She lives in the United
States and is the mother of two children. She has never met M. On cross-examination,
she said she travels to Canada very regularly to visit family and friends. She
testified that she last met with the respondent in 2019, after M. was born, in either
December 2019 or December 2020. She said that when she met up with the
respondent, M. was about two at the time. She said the respondent told her that
M. was “on a playdate.” On cross-examination, she admitted that it had been
years since she had seen the respondent before that one meeting. She admitted that
she and the applicant has not spoken since M. was born.
[213]       Ms.
Nady attempted to connect the respondent with another friend who had a child.
She had difficulty recalling when that took place. She guessed it was around
COVID, in 2020. On cross-examination, she said it was late 2021, but then said,
“or more recently or most likely 2022.”
[214]       The
extent of Ms. Nady’s evidence on the applicant’s controlling behaviour relates
to what she says she observed or was told to her by the respondent, which are
all incidents occurring before and up to 2007. She said that after the parties
moved in together, she and the respondent spoke less. She said that the applicant
was “extremely controlling and did not want [the respondent] to interact with” her,
and became angry that she “took a photo with the groomsmen and smiled politely
at them.”
[215]       At
trial, Ms. Nady testified that she and the respondent speak on the phone on
average once a month. This contrasts with her evidence in her affidavit which
suggests a relationship where the two had grown apart. She deposed in her
affidavit that:
[216]       Ms.
Nady blames the applicant for the fact that she and the respondent did not meet
more often when she came to Canada every year. She deposed in her affidavit
that:
[217]       Her
explanation is also inconsistent with what she told Dr. Harris. Dr. Harris
wrote:
[218]       Ms.
Nady testified that the respondent wanted to meet more often, and she asked the
respondent not to do so as she knew it would not be welcomed by the applicant. She
admitted that she has still not met M., up to the date of the trial.
[219]       Ms.
Nady said that she teaches at University of California, and during one of her training
sessions, she received a slideshow on intimate partner abuse and harassment. She
deposed in her affidavit that she sent a text to the respondent in or around 2020
about recognizing the signs of partner abuse. It was not evident on cross-examination
as to when the text was sent. The court also has some doubt about whether the
text is actually from Ms. Nady’s phone. She testified that texts get deleted
after a year, and she denied that the text is from the respondent’s phone, but
provided no explanation to how that particular text still existed at the time
she swore her affidavit some four years later in 2024.
[220]       Ms.
Nady has also given multiple different versions of what she was told by the
respondent as to why M. was not in school.
[221]       Ms.
Nady told Dr. Harris that the respondent told her that M. was not in school
because the respondent would not allow her to be vaccinated. Her evidence at
trial was that she was told by the respondent that she was not in school
because of COVID and also because the applicant wanted her to stay home. Judicial
notice can be taken as to when the pandemic was declared in Ontario, which was March
2020. M. would have been three years old at the time.
[222]       In
her affidavit, Ms. Nady said she “developed unwelcomed feelings towards G[xxx]
over time.” Dr. Harris indicated that Ms. Nady told her that that when she
first met the applicant, she did not like him. She says Dr. Harris took the
statement out of context. Coincidentally, Ms. Nady also says that Dr. Harris misconstrued
comments she made about the respondent’s father but was accurate in her
recitation of comments she made about the applicant.
[223]       Mr.
Krause is a friend of the respondent. Mr. Krause was a credible witness. Where
his memory failed him, given the passage of time, he candidly made that clear
to the court.
[224]       Mr.
Krause lives in Minnesota. Between 2011 to 2014, Mr. Krause was the
respondent’s manager. He moved to the United States in 2014. In his affidavit, he
deposed that the applicant would call the respondent multiple times throughout
the workday and during meetings. He deposed that he “abruptly exit[ed] meetings
or retreated to private offices/ meeting rooms to take repeated calls from [the
respondent].” Following the calls, the respondent “often looked afraid, shaken,
uneasy, quiet, and tense.” He would ask if she was “okay” and whether he could
do anything to help, but she “was unwilling to discuss specific details about
the calls.”
[225]       He
deposed that the respondent arrived at work on several occasions with marks on
her body, including bruising on her arms, wrists, and once on her face. He
testified that he “noticed signs of domestic issues and domestic violence” in
2011 or 2012, but it was confirmed when he spoke to the respondent in 2020. He said
that when he asked her about the marks, she would come up with excuses. On
cross-examination, he said he thought her answers were guarded and reserved. He
had suspicions and concerns about physical abuse but did not pursue further
investigation because the respondent did not disclose or confirm the nature of
abuse. In or around 2012, the respondent showed up to work with a severely
damaged work-issued laptop. Mr. Krause said that there “was little to no
explanation provided for the damaged laptop,” but he “had reason to believe
that [the respondent] was responsible for this.”
[226]       Mr.
Krause said that he observed the applicant “hiding in the bush,” but had few
details about what the statement meant. He said it was his impression that the
applicant “was obviously looking not be spotted.” He said he thought the
applicant’s behaviour was “stalking” but stated that although the respondent
indicated she did not know why he was there, “she did not convey danger or
being in fear.” He said that it was very rare. He testified that the applicant
also went on some of the company trips.
[227]       On
cross-examination, Mr. Krause testified that he last saw the applicant in 2012
or 2013. He has never met M. in person, but has met M. on FaceTime, when speaking
with the respondent. He has never seen the applicant, respondent, and M.
together.
[228]       On
cross-examination, Mr. Krause mentioned several individuals with whom the respondent
was close at work. He testified: “she was very social and very engaged with her
team in social settings. So, I would say that she was quite popular and had several
friends within the [company] scientific organization during the time I was with
her.” On a professional level, he was closer to her than some of the
individuals identified, “from a personal perspective,” and he indicated that she
would be closer to one of her colleagues in her peer group.
[229]       After
the respondent contacted him in 2021, Mr. Krause says they have been speaking
on the phone on a weekly basis, which is roughly the same frequency as before
the parties separated. They communicated both by text and by phone, with the
text messages usually initiating the conversation with a message such as, “can
you talk,” followed by a phone call. When Mr. Krause was asked if he would find
it surprising that the respondent indicated to police that she was unable to
call the police or even speak with other people because she was so controlled by
the applicant, Mr. Krause says that she would have to “go to a private location”
and would “often say that she would have to go to the grocery store.”
[230]       In
addition to going well beyond the affidavit, the respondent sought to solicit
Mr. Krause’s opinion on domestic violence and the prioritization of a child’s
safety, among other things. None of this evidence is helpful to the court.
[231]       Dr.
Avalle prepared a report dated January 21, 2024. She is a licensed clinical
forensic psychologist with a doctorate in Clinical Forensic Psychology obtained
in 2018 from The Chicago School of Professional Psychology. She indicated that the
Psy.D designation is equivalent to a doctorate designation in clinical psychology.
The respondent sought to have Dr. Avalle qualified as an expert in the areas of
trauma, domestic violence, custody evaluation, child abuse and neglect,
parental alienation, and “Family Bridges.”
[232]       Like
Mr. Wygant’s report, the court does not find Dr. Avalle’s report to be necessary
or of assistance to the court. She was retained to review records related to
the evaluation of the s. 30 report, which was completed by Dr. Harris, and to
review her recommendations, particularly referring the family to the Building
Family Bridges program in the context of intimate family violence and child
abuse.
[233]        Dr.
Avalle indicated that her area of expertise “was anything psychologically
relevant in the legal field.” She carries out evaluations and assessments in
different areas of law, including family law, and testified that “more specific
to this case would be doing forensic evaluation or providing therapy services
for individuals of all ages that have experienced some form of abuse and trauma
either in childhood or as an adult.” Dr. Avalle testified that this would
include completing a parenting or “custody” evaluation, “particularly where
child abuse is involved.”
[234]       Aside
from Dr. Harris’ report, it is not clear what documents Dr. Avalle reviewed in
order to arrive at her opinion. At trial, she testified that she did not meet
with the applicant. She did not meet with the respondent. She never met M. She
did not meet with M.’s therapist. Unlike Dr. Harris, she did not speak to the
parties, nor did she speak to the collateral sources.
[235]       Dr.
Avalle believed that since abuse had been substantiated, a referral to the
Building Family Bridges (BFB) program was not appropriate. In her report, she
noted that “given this case involves substantiated allegations of abuse against
the child by the father, this issue of “alienation” is moot on its surface, and
thus, any recommendations for programs predicated on this notion should not even
be considered.” At trial, she testified about facts not in evidence, and things
not addressed in her report.
[236]       Pursuant
to the order of Steele J., dated October 25, 2022, M. was referred by her parents
to Ms. Blakeley.
[237]       Ms.
Blakeley is a registered psychotherapist. In 2021, she completed her Masters in
counselling psychology. She sees M. on a weekly basis for private sessions, and
believes she is benefiting from therapy. She was “quite withdrawn and quiet” initially,
but has become “quite social, very open,” and “more confident” and “quite
playful” now. She is speaking more about things external to her therapy
sessions. Ms. Blakeley testified that M. has not disclosed any incidents of
sexual abuse to her.
[238]       There
were two disclosures made by M. which prompted reporting. First, Ms. Blakeley’s
notes from February 15, 2023, indicate: “M[xxx] disclosed that her father hurt
her neck and that her father used his arms and wrapped them around her neck,
and it hurt.” On cross-examination, Ms. Blakeley indicated that the disclosure
was made as the session was ending. She testified that M. said, “I have
something to tell you.” Ms. Blakeley invited her to share the information. M. also
told her that “her father never lets her feel her feelings and would say mean
things to her.” She testified that M. would not expand on that. M. indicated
that she felt “sad and scared of her father and scared that he would hurt her
again.” Ms. Blakeley described that “M[xxx] had her eyebrows furrowed when she
was expressing this, but she did not seem overly distressed, as noted.” When she
brought M. back into the waiting room where her mother was, “she snuggled into
her mother, gave her a bit of a hug, and stated: ‘I told Jessica what daddy
did’, and mom praised M[xxx] for sharing, and M[xxx] seemed happy with mom, and
excitable and sort of being silly when getting ready to leave.”
[239]       The
second disclosure was on June 14th, 2023. Her notes indicate: “M[xxx] indicated
that her father hurt her arm and leg. She said, “Dad scratched me on my arm and
leg with his nails.” Ms. Blakeley indicated that M. shared about being brought
to a visit with her father and expressed that she was scared and sad to go
because her father has hurt her. M. then disclosed that “approximately three
years ago” he hurt her arm and leg. Ms. Blakeley testified that it was M. who said,
“approximately three years ago.”
[240]       Ms.
Blakeley spoke to Dr. Harris on June 13, 2023, and advised her that M. presented
as a typical six-year-old, is functioning well, was very intelligent, appeared
to have appropriate interactions with her mother, and did not have a lot of
details when she spoke about her father. She testified that M. now seems to be
quite playful and speaks about things going on outside of the therapy sessions.
[241]       As
noted, evidence in family law is given by way of viva voce
evidence, except with leave of the court, which was granted in this case.
[242]       Evidence
in chief of the parties was adduced primarily through an affidavit. In the
result, the affidavits ought to have been confined to the statement of facts
within the personal knowledge of each of the parties. Documents put forward as
exhibits, absent an agreement as to the truth of the contents, must be capable
of being proved by the deponent, in the same way as if they were testifying as
a witness in court. The affidavits before the court included inadmissible
hearsay evidence, including opinion evidence and argument.
[243]       For
example, the applicant’s affidavit included expert reports, police records,
supervising service centre records, and excerpts from the transcript of the respondent.
As for the respondent, her affidavit also included hearsay evidence and included
opinion evidence (dealt with below).
[244]       One
exception to the inclusion of such inadmissible evidence is an expressed allegation
of recent fabrication.
[245]       As the parties are self represented, there was no voir dire on
the admissibility of evidence.  In a reply affidavit, the respondent raised her
objection to some of the evidence in the applicant’s affidavit.
[246]       There are also exhibits attached to affidavits which contained
hearsay evidence, and no agreement by the party regarding the truth of their contents.
As noted above, exhibits annexed to an affidavit are not sworn evidence: see Katz;
Sears. In Sears, at para. 32, the court stated:
[247]       Expert
opinion evidence is only admissible if it is: (i) relevant; (ii) necessary to
assist the trier of fact in drawing appropriate inferences; (iii) not subject
to an exclusionary rule; and (iv) given by a properly qualified expert: R.
v. Mohan, 1994 CanLII 80 (SCC), 1994 SCC 80, [1994] 2 S.C.R. 9. The Supreme Court has indicated
that opinion evidence that does not meet these criteria should not be admitted:
White Burgess Langille Inman v. Abbott and Haliburton Co., 2015 SCC 23, [2015]
2 SCR 182, at para. 23.
[248]       During
the course of the trial, the parties asked various experts to comment on the credibility
of evidence of a witness. The ultimate determination as to the credibility or
reliability of a particular witness is for the trier of fact and is not the
proper subject of expert opinion: see R. v. Marquard, 1993 CanLII 37 (SCC), [1993] 4 S.C.R.
223, at para. 49.
[249]       Under
s. 30 of the Children’s Law Reform Act, the court may seek the
assistance of persons having special skills or experience to provide a report
on the needs of the child and ability or willingness of parties to meet those
needs. The provision reads:
[250]       Section
30(9) provides that the report is admissible in evidence in the application. The
parties argued that the report should be filed as a numbered exhibit, and
although the court ultimately ruled in the parties’ favour, it was made clear to
them that the law of evidence still governed the admissibility of any hearsay
evidence in the report. Neither party was able point the court to any authority
to indicate that admitting the report into evidence was tantamount to accepting
the report for the truth of the content. Indeed, either party has the right to
cross-examine the assessor.
[251]       Apart
from reports governed by s. 52 of the Evidence Act, R.S.O. 1990, c. E.23,
expert evidence at a trial court is usually the viva voce evidence of
the expert, and not the report the expert provided before trial: 1162740
Ontario Limited v. Pingue, 2017 ONCA 52, 135
O.R. (3d) 792, citing Michelle Fuerst and Mary Anne Sanderson, Ontario
Courtroom Procedure, 4th ed. (Markham: LexisNexis, 2016), at pp. 1004-1005;
Iannarella v. Corbett, 2015 ONCA 110, 124 O.R. (3d) 523, at para. 131.
[252]       Throughout the trial, the applicant or his agent advised the court
that the respondent had uploaded a document during the trial to Case Center.
The applicant submitted at times that the believed documents were altered.
Trial Briefs and Exhibit Briefs had already been delivered. The respondent
claimed she gave notice in October of 2023. During her own testimony, the
respondent sought to tender into evidence of an “anxiety assessment report”
prepared by a practitioner, to which the applicant objected. There
was no affidavit from the practitioner. There was no consent by the parties. The
respondent did not intend to call the practitioner and fairness required that
the practitioner be available for cross-examination.
[253]       In Girao, the Ontario Court of Appeal addressed the
admissibility of a report under ss. 35 and 52 of the Evidence Act. In
that case, the report was a letter from a doctor. The cited the Supreme
Court of Canada’s decision of R. v. Bradshaw, 2017 SCC 35, [2017] 1
S.C.R. 865, at para. 1, and reiterated that hearsay evidence “is presumptively
inadmissible because – in the absence of the opportunity to cross-examine the
declarant at the time the statement is made – it is often difficult for the
trier of fact to assess its truth”: Girao, at para. 43. At para. 45, the
court went on to state:
[254]       In
this case, there was no agreement by the parties about the note. There was no
affidavit from the practitioner to file the note, and the practitioner was not
being made available for cross-examination.
[255]       A
basic tenet of our law is that the usual witness may not give opinion evidence,
and must testify only to facts within their knowledge, observation, and
experience: R. v. D.(D.), 2000 SCC 43, [2000] 2 S.C.R. 275, at para. 49;
Graat v. The Queen, 1982 CanLII 33 (SCC), [1982] 2 S.C.R. 819.
[256]       The
respondent repeatedly sought the opinion of various witnesses on a wide range
of subjects involving domestic violence, coercive control, and the behaviour of
children exposed to violence, among other things. She also provided opinion
evidence, and the following are a few examples from her affidavit.
[257]       At
paragraph 163, she stated: “M[xxx]’s statements and behaviors are consistent
with trauma and abuse.”
[258]       At
para. 152 of her affidavit, the respondent deposed:
[259]       At
para. 182, she stated:
[260]       On multiple occasions during the trial, the respondent attempted to
cross-examine witnesses on articles and statistics. She did so regardless of
the court’s ruling, and accordingly, it must be clear that none of the articles
put to expert witnesses, whether the witness was a litigation expert or
participant expert, were known by the witnesses, nor did these expert witnesses
acknowledge the articles as being authoritative in the field.  It is well
established that if a witness is asked about a text and has no knowledge of it
or denies its authority, no further use can be made of the text by reading
extracts of it into evidence. However, if the witness admits its authority,
then they may be asked to explain any apparent differences between its opinion
and their own: R. v. Marquard, at para. 114.
[261]       Both
parties relied on documents, such as text messages and emails, which they sent
to others. There was no agreement by the parties regarding the use to be made
at trial of the document brief, or any of the other documents. As noted, the Court
of Appeal has urged that parties engage in this practice: Girao, at
para. 53; Iannarella, at paras. 127-128; and Pingue, at paras.
39-40. Unless there was an agreement by the parties, the court gives little
weight, if any at all, to the content of the documents.
[262]       Both
parties also repeatedly relied on statements they made out of court in emails
and texts, statements to staff at the supervising centres, and statements to
authorities, among others. The court has concluded that no exception applies to
these statements, and they are inadmissible in whatever form they are in before
the court. It is well established that prior consistent statements to prove
that the maker of the statement is telling the truth are presumptively
inadmissible, because they tend to be self-serving statements: R. v. Morin,
2024 ONCA 562, at para. 20; R. v. Khan, 2017 ONCA 114, 136 O.R. (3d)
520, leave to appeal refused, [2017] S.C.C.A. No. 139. The Supreme Court of
Canada noted that a prior consistent statement cannot corroborate in-court
testimony, as it comes from the same source as the testimony and is not independent
proof. Moreover, repetition does not “enhance the value or truth of the
testimony”: R. v. Ellard, 2009 SCC 27, [2009] 2 S.C.R. 19, at para. 31.
There are exceptions to this general rule. One exception is where the purpose
of the prior consistent statement is to rebut an allegation of recent
fabrication: R. v. Stirling, 2008 SCC 10, [2008] 1 S.C.R. 272. Most
recently, in Morin, at para. 20, the Court of Appeal explained the basis
for inadmissibility as follows:
[263]       As
indicated above, the court did not find the critique reports of either Mr.
Wygant or Dr.  Avalle helpful to the court. In M. v. F., 2015 ONCA
277, 58 R.F.L. (7th) 1, the Ontario Court of Appeal indicated that critique
evidence does not meet the criteria for expert evidence set out in R. v.
Mohan. Critique evidence is rarely appropriate. It generally has little
probative value, adds expense, and risks elevating the animosity of the parties:
M. v. F.; Sordi v. Sordi, 2011
ONCA 665, 13 R.F.L. (7th) 197.
[264]       This
application was commenced under the Divorce Act, R.S.C., 1985, c. 3 (2nd
Supp.), and for corollary relief under the Family Law Act, R.S.O. 1990,
c. F.3. The Divorce Act takes paramountcy over the relief sought for
parenting time, decision-making responsibility, child support, and spousal
support. The Family Law Act governs the claim for the equalization of
net family property asserted by both parties.
[265]       This
court may make an order providing for the exercise of parenting time or
decision-making responsibility for any child of the marriage: Divorce Act,
at s 16.1. Decision-making responsibility for a child, or any aspect of that
responsibility, may be allocated to either spouse or to both spouses: Divorce
Act, at s. 16.3.
[266]       The
order may be for a definite or indefinite period, and the court may impose any
terms, conditions, and restrictions it considers appropriate: Divorce Act,
at s. 16.1(5).
[267]       The
court shall take into consideration only the best interests of the child of the
marriage in making a parenting order: Divorce Act, at s. 16(1). Section
16(3) lists factors for the court to consider, discussed below.
[268]       When
considering the factors referred to in s. 16(3), this court shall give primary
consideration to the child’s physical, emotional, and psychological safety,
security, and well-being: Divorce Act, at s. 16(2).
[269]       The
best interests test is the only test to be applied. Parental rights, interests,
and preferences play no role in this determination: Young v. Young,
1993 CanLII 34 (SCC), [1993] 4 S.C.R. 3, at pp. 35-36, 44, 57, 117.
[270]       The
child’s best interests are not merely “paramount” – they are the only
consideration in this analysis: Gordon v. Goertz, 1996 CanLII 191 (SCC), [1996] 2 S.C.R. 27 at
para. 28; Mattina v. Mattina, 2018 ONCA 641.
[271]       Assessing
the “best interests of [a] child [for purposes of a parenting order] is a heavy
responsibility, with profound impacts on children, families and society”: Barendregt,
at para. 8. It is also a highly “individualized and discretionary” inquiry: Barendregt,
at paras. 9, 97.
[272]       Under
s. 16(2) of the Divorce Act, as amended, in deciding what is in the best
interests of the child, the court must give primary consideration to a child’s
“physical, emotional and psychological safety, security and well-being.”  In
doing so, the court is guided by the factors in s. 16(3).
[273]       Section
16(3) lists some of the factors to be considered by the court in determining
the best interests of the child. While the list is not exhaustive, the court
“shall” consider “all factors related the circumstances of the child,”
including the following: the child’s needs, given their age and stage of
development (s. 16(3)(a)); the nature and strength of the child’s relationship
with each parent (s. 16(3)(b)); the willingness of each parent to support the
development and maintenance of the child’s relationship with the other parent (s.
16(3)(c)); the history of care of the child (s. 16(3) (d)); the child’s views
and preferences (s.16(3) (e)); the child’s cultural, linguistic, religious, and
spiritual upbringing and heritage (s. 16(3)(f)); any plans for the child’s care
(s. 16(3)(g)); the ability and willingness of each parent to meet the needs of
the child (s. 16(3)(h)); the ability and willingness of each person in respect
of whom the order would apply to communicate and cooperate, in particular with
one another, on matters affecting the child (s. 16(3)(h)); any family violence
and its impact on, among other things, the ability and willingness of any
person who engaged in the family violence to care for and meet the needs of the
child (s.16(3)(h)(i)); the appropriateness of making an order that would
require persons in respect of whom the order would apply to cooperate on issues
affecting the child (s. 16(3)(j)(ii)); and any civil or criminal proceeding,
order, condition, or measure that is relevant to the safety, security and
well-being of the child (s. 16(3)(k)).
[274]       M.
is seven years old. She is being homeschooled. From the recent accounts by Ms. Blakeley,
she is doing well. The professionals, including the respondent, say that she is
an intelligent child.
[275]       Ms.
Blakeley says that at M.’s age, M. is unable to meet her needs completely on
her own and she is dependent on others. She is now functioning well.
[276]       Many
expressed concerns about M.’s lack of socializing with kids of her own age and
learning social skills, including Sharma J. Despite promising CAS and Dr.
Harris that she would put M. in school, the respondent has failed to do so, and
her evidence in her affidavit falls far short of establishing that she has made
any attempts to do so.
[277]       Dr.
Harris is of the view that school would equip M. with many social benefits and
promote her social skills development with same-aged peers. When M. was
interviewed by Dr. Harris, M. was not able to name a single friend. This is
consistent with the applicant father’s evidence that M. is isolated and this relates
to his desire for her to attend school. From the respondent’s evidence, the
respondent maintains that homeschooling is best for M.’s “profile.” The
respondent recently enrolled M. in a homeschool group, but according to Dr.
Harris, that is not sufficient to overcome the disadvantage of M. not socializing
with her peers at school.
[278]       In
resolving parenting time and primary residence disputes, emphasis must be
placed on the critical importance of bonding, attachment, and stability in the
lives of young children: Barnes v. Parks, 2001 CanLII 241146 (Ont. C.A.).
The Divorce Act also requires the court to assess the nature and
strength of the child’s relationship with each parent.
[279]       Since
separation, parenting time has been primarily with the respondent mother. This arrangement
was unilaterally imposed by the mother.
[280]       Both
Ms. Blakeley and Dr. Harris note that regardless of the origin of the abuse
allegations, M. believes that she was abused by her dad and has a fear of him. M.
believes that she was harmed by her father, resulting in fear which contributes
to the parent-child contact problems. However, M. appears to still have a bond
with her father, despite the respondent’s mother’s repeated claims that she was
“terrified” and afraid of her father. At the successful visit discussed above,
it only took 15 minutes for M. to warm up to her father, and at the end of the
sole visit that took place 16 months after she had last seen her father, M.
allowed the applicant to help her with her boots, hat, and mittens.
[281]        Despite
the contact problems since the separation, driven by the respondent’s fabricated
allegations of sexual abuse, and contempt of all court orders, M.’s bond with
her father was still present.
[282]       The
respondent is not willing to support the relationship with the applicant. The
applicant, on the other hand, contemplates a future that includes the
respondent working with a reunification therapist to assist the parties and support
them in learning how to parallel parent, so that the parties can maintain a
positive relationship with M.
[283]       The
respondent has disobeyed every court order, while appearing that she was
complying with the orders. Of the 52 scheduled parenting visit, the only one
that took place was with Dr. Harris. The notes of the professionals before the
court indicate that the respondent has repeatedly asked M. to tell them why she
does not want to see her father and has asked her numerous times whether she
wanted to see her father. In doing so, the respondent was sabotaging the
applicant’s right to parenting time. The supervising professionals who
testified indicated that M. repeats the same phrases over and over.
[284]       In
his endorsement dated October 2, 2022, Sharma J. commented that he was not
satisfied that the respondent had exercised reasonable efforts to give effect
to the parties’ agreement to use Renew. The court agrees with those comments.
The record before the court indicates unacceptable conduct by the respondent in
this regard, which frustrated the applicant’s ability to exercise supervised
parenting time with Renew. Justice Sharma also expressed his concern about the
respondent’s ability to parent M. and his concern that the child was not in
school given the level of socialization shown by the child. He noted:
[285]       Dr.
Harris’ evidence is that the respondent “did not cooperate, in my view, with
the court ordered supervised parenting time.” That fact is manifestly apparent
from reviewing the supervising records. The respondent repeatedly showed up
late in the beginning. She refused to follow the directions of the staff as to
how to get M. to enter the building, and then would turn around and ask them
what they would suggest. There is ample evidence to indicate that the
respondent not only did the bare minimum, but she actively sabotaged the
applicant’s parenting visits.
[286]        The
respondent takes the position at trial that she showed up at the visits but
blames the failed visits on M.’s unwillingness to see her father. Supervised
visits were being scheduled when M. was five and six years old. No visits have
been scheduled beyond October 2023, as the respondent refused to provide her
consent for Brayden’s supervisors to speak with M.’s therapist, Ms. Blakeley.
Coincidentally, these events occurred around the same time Czutrin J.’s order
on October 23, 2023. Justice Czutrin directed that the respondent remain in her
vehicle for supervised access visits facilitated by Brayden. The order stated
that the respondent:
[287]       Despite
the order of Czutrin J., the respondent has refused to consent to let Brayden
Supervision Centre supervisors speak with M.’s therapist. Ms.
Blakeley testified that she provided a consent to both the applicant and the
respondent so that she could speak to Brayden. The applicant signed and
returned the consent. The respondent did not sign any consent forms sent to her
and did not want to provide her consent. Ms. Blakeley thought it was a
reasonable request.
[288]       At the trial, it became apparent during Ms. Blakeley’s testimony, that
the respondent had not produced her records to the applicant either.
[289]       The
applicant has consented. Further visits have not been scheduled. Despite the
very serious nature of the allegations involving sexual abuse of a parent of a
child, the CAS notes indicate that the respondent did not always co-operate
when the CAS asked for a home visit.
[290]        In
her report, Dr. Harris sets out the ways in which the respondent did not
support M. emotionally, and physically, with parenting time. She and multiple supervision
professional have indicated that the respondent could have done more to support
M., in order to facilitate the visits. Dr. Harris noted that “showing up
physically is not the same thing as supporting the child to engage in a particular
activity, event, parenting time.”
[291]       On
the other hand, the respondent has attempted to enlist others who should be
neutral to “advocate” for M. to not see her father, including CAS staff, and
M.’s court appointed therapist, Ms. Blakeley, who has managed to not choose
sides. Ms. Blakeley testified at trial that the respondent had asked her to advocate
for M. to not see her father.
[292]       The
respondent is clear that the only option she will support is a therapeutic
goodbye, whereby the applicant and his family is severed from the child’s life.
The steps the respondent has taken to ensure that the applicant would not have
any parenting time with his daughter indicates that she cannot be trusted to
support M.’s relationship with her father. Dr. Harris noted that children are
very attuned to their parents’ verbal and nonverbal distress, as it is critical
to their survival. From small to large gestures, examples include: refusing to
take a piece of cheesecake - which was M.’s favourite - that her dad made for a
visit, when M. would have enjoyed it and wanted to ensure that her mother had
piece; the respondent’s public rejection of a small overture to assist M.; and her
advising the supervisor that a note, which the applicant was encouraged to
write to his daughter, should not be read as to do so would “scare” M. These
actions demonstrate the lengths the respondent has gone to in order to ensure
that the applicant is no longer a part of M.’s world.
[293]       Dr.
Harris believes the respondent will continue to make more sexual abuse
allegations as long as there is ongoing litigation. However, that is a choice
that the respondent has and has always had.
[294]       Based on the evidence, the court is satisfied that the respondent is
not willing to support M.’s relationship with her father. The court is
satisfied that the applicant is willing to support his daughter’s relationship
with his mother.
[295]       Until
the separation, M. lived with both parents. She has a strong attachment and emotional
bond with her mother. The respondent has been her sole caregiver since the
separation, but that has been due to the respondent’s allegations of sexual
abuse of M., the fact that the respondent has disobeyed court orders, and the multiple
roadblocks the respondent has put up to prevent the applicant from seeing M. It
is difficult to assess the applicant’s parenting ability, which was partly the
purpose of the numerous court orders affording the applicant supervised
parenting time with M.
[296]       The
court accepts the applicant’s evidence that he had a very good relationship
with M. before the separation. There is some basis to infer that this was the
case. As indicated above, even with the attempts made by the respondent to
undermine that relationship, it was evident by the short period of time that it
took M. to warm up to her father (less than 15 minutes), despite the
respondent’s repeated protestations that she was “terrified” and “afraid” of
her father, that there is a bond. Ms. Atcha’s evidence was that this was
unusual.
[297]       The
court is entitled to look behind the veil of an existing status quo to
understand how it came about and to assess whether that status quo is itself in
the child’s best interests: B.J.T. v. J.D., 2022 SCC 24, 85 C.P.C. (8th)
1, at para. 73. The respondent’s refusal to obey court orders in relation to
the applicant’s parenting visit created the status quo. A party’s unilateral
imposition of a post-separation parenting schedule to gain tactical advantage
is not sufficient to create a status quo: see J.(D.L.) v. L.(D.L.), 2009
PECA 6, 284 Nfld. & P.E.I.R. 316, at para. 19; Miller v. White,
2018 PECA 11, 10 R.F.L. (8th) 251, at para. 39.
[298]       It
is well established that that a party cannot take advantage of the existence of
a state of affairs produced by their own wrong: see Buduchnist Credit Union
Limited v. 2321197 Ontario Inc., 2024 ONCA 57, 169 O.R. (3d) 641; Berlingieri
v. DeSantis et al. (1980), 1980 CanLII 1823 (ON CA), 31 O.R. (2d) 1 (C.A.); Barclays Bank PLC
v. Devonshire Trust, 2013 ONCA 494, 365 D.L.R. (4th) 15, at
paras. 147-61, leave to appeal refused, [2013] S.C.C.A. No. 374; and McCallum
et al. v. Zivojinovic (1977), 1977 CanLII 1151 (ON CA), 16 O.R. (2d) 721 (C.A.), at p. 726.
[299]       The
views and preferences of the child is one of factor that the court may consider
when determining the best interest of the child. In M.A.A. v. D.E.M.E.,
2020 ONCA 486, 152 O.R. (3d) 81, at para. 46, the Ontario Court of Appeal stated:
[300]       In
S.S. v. R.S, 2021 ONSC 2137, at para. 31, Mandhane J. referred to the United
Nations Convention on the Rights of the Child, and its support for the
importance of considering the views and preferences of the child. She noted that
“in assessing the child’s best interests, the judge must take into
consideration the right of the child to preserve his or her relationship with
both parents, together with the other elements relevant to the case.”
[301]       In
Knapp v. Knapp, 2021 ONCA 305, 155 O.R. (3d) 721, Benotto
J.A., speaking for the court, noted that while the views and preferences of
children must be considered in all matters affecting them, they must be viewed
in context.
[302]       When
conducting the best interest analysis, I note that the court is permitted to
discount the wishes of the children when their wishes are not independent: A.M.
v. C.H., 2019 ONCA 764, 32 R.F.L. (8th) 1, at para. 27. Here, M. has told
CAS that she fears her dad taking her away from her mother. She also disclosed
that her mother told her that her father would take her away. In the court’s
view, M.’s views and her feelings about her father have been corrupted by the
respondent.
[303]       In
this case, M. is seven years old now, and was almost five when the litigation
started. There is ample evidence to support a finding of coaching by the
respondent. There is also ample evidence for the court to conclude that the
respondent’s false allegations have damaged M.’s
relationship with her father. In the circumstances, the court gives little
weight to the views and preferences of M., as they are tainted by the
respondent’s own views and preferences: see A.M. v. C.H., at
para. 75.
[304]       Prior
to the litigation starting, the respondent appeared to want to control the
extent to which M. was exposed to her Chinese heritage, culture, and language,
as evidenced by the detailed Rules to M.’s grandparents. The respondent now
says that M. is participating in various events so that she may be exposed to
her Chinese cultural heritage. This is a new development, and while welcomed,
is not sufficient to connect her to the rich culture and heritage that she has,
as opposed to what M. might gain by reconnecting with her father and his
heritage, without the imposition of Rules. Both parties are Christian, though
the respondent has indicated that she is Catholic. On the evidence, there does
not appear to be any impediment to M. being exposed to her parents’ religion. The
applicant has reconnected with his own Church, as has the respondent.
[305]       The
applicant’s plan of care includes the reversal of M.’s primary residence, a 90-day
block out period, and reunification therapy. His mother will be involved in
assisting with M.’s hygiene. He currently lives with his parents. M. will have
her own room. His expectation is that both  parties will ultimately be able to
parent M. together.
[306]       The
respondent seeks an order for a “therapeutic goodbye” (discussed below) and
therapy to assist with the transition, but she ultimately desires that the
applicant has no further relationship with M. She proposes that M. has therapy
from a “trauma informed approach.”
[307]       Some
concerns have been raised about the respondent’s mental abilities. Dr. Harris
says that she is “fragile,” but the comment was made in the context of her
evidence on the pros and cons of the two options. The court is not able to make
any determination on the issue.
[308]       There
is no doubt that the respondent loves her daughter and is very proud of her
daughter; however, she appears to lack insight on the harm that her conduct is causing
her daughter, as evidenced by her insistence on eradicating the applicant from M.’s
life. The experts have referred to her relationship with M. as “restrictive
gate keeping.” She has repeatedly exposed her daughter to different authorities
and professionals to be interviewed about the allegations of sexual abuse,
including CAS, CYAC, personnel at the supervising centres, and a therapist. The
therapist says that whatever the source of the information, M. believes that
her father hurt her; that is now her reality. But, it is perhaps a reality
planted by her mother.
[309]       The
respondent has also prevented others from assessing the applicant’s parenting
abilities. On the evidence before the court, it is the applicant who has continued
to focus on what is in the best interest of M., to the extent that he was
prepared to agree to a therapeutic goodbye. With the support that he has in
place, including his parents – his mother, a retired nurse, and his father, a
chef – the court is satisfied that the applicant has an ability to care for M.’s
needs.
[310]       The
applicant father says that M. and the respondent live socially isolated lives.
M. is homeschooled. She has not been placed in a public school, although when Dr.
Harris was being cross-examined, she noted that the respondent told both her
and CAS that she would put M. in school. The respondent has not done so.
Although the respondent brings M. to a group drop-in
centre, Dr. Harris noted that this is insufficient.
[311]       Given
M.’s age, the parties would be required to communicate openly and freely with
each other. Apart from their communication through agents and lawyers since the
litigation started, the parties have not communicated. There is no realistic
prospect that these two parties would be able to communicate and cooperate with
each other in the foreseeable future in the best interests of M.  In the circumstances
of this case, against a backdrop of family violence and mistrust between the
parties, it is not feasible that they would be able to cooperate on issues
affecting M. M. has been exposed to the conflict between her parents. A CAS
note indicates that M. told the worker that her mother told her that the
applicant would hurt them. She has been told that her father will lock them up
and will hurt her mother. There is no expectation that the respondent will
change course. The evidence indicates that the contempt motions, the court
orders, and the costs awards have not deterred the respondent.
[312]       As
discussed, many have called the respondent’s parenting “restrictive gate
keeping.” She homeschools M. and co-sleeps with her, as noted by Dr. Harris. The
evidence supports that this was the case before the separation. There is
evidence before the court to infer that the applicant’s decision to challenge
M.’s sleep schedule and her lack of daylight exposure was the triggering event
in an already complex family dynamic.
[313]       Given
the very high conflict between the parties, the history of intimate partner
violence alleged by both parties, and the serious allegations of sexual abuse
repeatedly made by the respondent (which the court finds, on a balance of
probabilities, are unfounded), and Dr. Harris’ prediction that the respondent
will continue to make these allegations, shared parenting is not an alternative
option.
[314]       The
court shall consider any family violence and its impact on the following:
(i) the ability and willingness of any person who engaged in the family violence
to care for and meet the needs of the child, and (ii) the appropriateness
of making an order that would require persons in respect of whom the order
would apply to cooperate on issues affecting the child. The family violence
analysis will be addressed below.
[315]        The
court shall consider the existence of any civil or criminal proceeding, order,
condition, or measure that is relevant to the safety, security and well-being
of the child.
[316]       At
the time of the trial, the applicant had an outstanding criminal charge and a
restraining order (500m). The Crown withdrew the previous charges. The most
recent charges on September 15, 2023, related to alleged incidents in October
2020. The applicant stated that he intended to plead not guilty to the new
charges. On the evidence before the court, the applicant has obeyed with all
the court orders, directions, and restrictions imposed on him. All the
witnesses, experts, and participant experts, including the staff from the
supervising centres, testified that the applicant had complied with all
directions.
[317]       As
discussed, most family violence goes unreported: Barendregt, at para 143.
The recent amendments to the Divorce Act include a non-exhaustive list
of what constitutes family violence. Section 2(1) defines family violence as
any conduct, whether the conduct constitutes a criminal offence, by a family
member towards another family member, that is violent, threatening, coercively
controlling, or causes on to fear for their own safety. For a child, it
includes the direct or indirect exposure to such conduct. The provision reads
as follows:
[318]      
Further, as noted above, under s. 16(2) of the Divorce Act, the
court’s primary consideration is the child’s physical, emotional, and
psychological safety, security, and well-being, above all other best interest
considerations.
[319]       In
Barendregt, at para. 143, the Supreme Court of Canada noted that research
shows that children exposed to family violence are at risk of emotional and
behavioural problems throughout their lives, and that harm may come from direct
or indirect exposure to domestic conflicts, which includes observing the
incident, experiencing its aftermath, or hearing about it.
[320]       Here,
CAS verified “domestic violence” in March 2022. The court is not bound by CAS’s
determination. In this case, the court agrees that there has been family
violence. In fact, neither party disputes that their relationship went through
periods where intimate partner violence was involved. However, the parties disagree,
on who the perpetrator of the violence was and who the victim was.
[321]       Section
16(4) of the Divorce Act sets out several factors that the court must
consider in assessing the impact of any family violence. The factors assist the
court in determining the ability and willingness of a parent who engaged in
family violence to care for and meet the needs of the child, and the
appropriateness of making an order which would require parties to cooperate on
matters related to the child.
[322]       Under
s. 16(4)(a), the court must consider
the nature, seriousness, and frequency of the family violence and when it
occurred. Here, both parties have raised serious allegations of intimate
partner violence and family violence.
[323]       The
allegations of family violence by the respondent are quite serious, including emotional,
financial, and physical abuse, threats of murder/suicide, and coercive control.
The respondent’s allegations include conduct which is covered by each sub-paragraph
of s. 2(1) of the Divorce Act, except for threats to kill or harm pets.
[324]       On
the evidence, there was family violence, including coercive control. There is
no doubt that M. was exposed to family violence. Given the respondent’s serious
credibility issues, discussed above, it is a complex issue. The party who has
consistently shown controlling behaviour, and gotten into altercations with
others, is the respondent.
[325]       Viewed
in their totality, many of the alleged incidents, though admittedly quite
serious and disturbing, are mostly historical in nature. The only attenuating
circumstance is that the parties are no longer together, and most of the
alleged incidents occurred before M. was born, or before she turned three years
old. Based on Dr. Harris’ and Ms. Blakeley’s assessments on early childhood
memory, M. would more than likely not have little, if any, memory of the
incidents.
[326]       Dr.
Harris says that M. may be in need of protection from the respondent, rather
than from the applicant.
[327]       The
respondent repeatedly contacted TPS after her initial contact. At trial, the
respondent testified that she was only contacting the investigating officer in
charge of the case to update them. The chronology below indicates that the
police complaints started the date of separation. Her friend, Mr. Zagala,
called the police on December 28, 2021. The applicant says the respondent had
the friend call the police. Mr. Zagala did not testify at trial. Her friend,
Ms. Mestanza, went to the police in 2022, after charges were dropped against the
applicant.
[328]       The
charges laid in December 2021 against the applicant were withdrawn by the Crown
in October 2022. Four months after the Crown withdrew the charges, the
respondent emailed the police to report 38 additional allegations or incidents
which took place between 2006 and December 2021, and related to a range of complaints
from assaults to threats, and to property damage, among other things. The
summary below tells only a partial story. When the dates for various court attendance,
court orders, and supervising visits are combined with the chronology of
charges, and the timing of the CAS referrals (Appendix A), the picture that
emerges is that the respondent involved various authorities to gain a tactical
advantage, as discussed more fully below. In repeatedly alleging family
violence to various authorities and professionals involved in the case, the
respondent herself was engaging in coercive and controlling behaviour, which
would meet the definition of family violence under s. 2(1) of the Act.
[329]       The
charges are summarized in the chart below. At least 35 police officers were involved.
[330]       The court must take into consideration
whether there is a pattern of coercive and controlling behaviour
in relation to a family member.
[331]       The
police notes indicate that the respondent claimed that she had been physically
and emotionally abused since 2008, and “the reason she called the Police now
was that she was noticing a shift in abuse from not just her, but to her
daughter.” One police note reads:
[332]       At
trial, the respondent said that the applicant controlled her transportation, socialization,
and her movements. As indicated above, her friends testified to having frequent
communication with her, weekly contact in the case of Mr. Krause, and using
apps to communicate. The respondent’s friends testified to communicating with
her through texting and phoning each other. Mr. Krause testified that the
respondent would also go grocery shopping and speak to him. There is no
indication from either of her friends that the applicant accompanied her on
these jaunts or was with her while she and Mr. Krause had their weekly conversations.
From Ms. Nady’s evidence, she and the respondent were in regular contact in her
leading re-examination question, Mr. Krause suggested that the respondent would
drive to the grocery store. Dr. Harris noted in her report that despite
alleging that the applicant “used social isolation as a coercive control
tactic, Ms. Y[xx] has remained relatively socially isolated since separation.
Relationships with her family remain strained, she has few friends.” None of
the friends who testified at trial have met M. in person despite more than three
years elapsing since the parties separated.
[333]       Moreover,
Dr. Harris indicated in her report that “while I can understand and even agree
with the verification of domestic violence made by the CAS, there are problems
with the domestic violence narrative.” Dr. Harris went on to state:
[334]       The
respondent’s evidence of the applicant’s control over every aspect of her life
was belied by the following:
[335]       Various
professionals have used the adjective “controlling” in relation to the
respondent’s actions and behaviour. She attempted to influence what went in the
CAS notes and the supervising notes. Even after Dr. Harris completed her
report, the respondent contacted her.
[336]       The
respondent’s controlling behaviour is evident in relation to her daughter,
which predates the separation, and extended to the controlling the conduct of
the applicant’s parents.
[337]       The
extent of the respondent’s coercive control, as disclosed by the evidence,
extends to the numerous reports about the applicant to the police, the arming
of her daughter with statements to relay to professionals with a duty to report
so that CAS would re-open its file if closed at the time, involving her friends
in filing reports to the police, attempting to get CAS and the child’s
therapist to advocate against the applicant having any parenting time,
successfully engaging in all manners of conduct to ensure that the applicant
would not exercise his parenting time (including accusing his parents of abuse
after they offered to facilitate the parenting), and throughout the litigation,
ignoring every single court order which attempted to address her conduct,
without success.
[338]       
The following are some examples of the respondent’s coercive and
controlling behaviour:
[339]       After the applicant was arrested for assault and left the
matrimonial home, over the course of the ensuing months, the respondent
disclosed to various authorities, including TPS, that M. disclosed that the
applicant had sexually abused M. The respondent disclosed that she herself had
witnessed instances of sexual abuse, sexual grooming behavior, and many
sexualized statements to M.
[340]       The respondent deposed that on January 4, 2022, M. disclosed to CAS
that the applicant “often sexually assaulted her.” The respondent said that the
following day, January 5, 2022, M. made further disclosure to the police about
the “sexual assaults.” The respondent said that M. has disclosed “many times” to
the CAS, to Access Supervisors, her therapist, her family doctor, and to others,
about the abuses and social restrictions she experienced, and that she does not
feel safe around the applicant. In the respondent’s sworn affidavit, which was
sworn in opposition to the contempt motion, which the applicant also relies
upon, the respondent deposed that M. made disclosures to her on December 28,
2021, which is the day the applicant was arrested.
[341]       On cross examination by the respondent, Dr. Harris indicated that
she did not include safety planning as part of her report, because the risks
were not at that level at the time of the assessment.
[342]       The
various investigations by TPS, CAS, and CYAC indicate that the respondent
reported the following incidents:
[343]       Specifically,
the CAS file notes the following allegations made by the respondent in relation
to the sexual abuse reports:
[344]       The
applicant says he did not have complete control over his daughter’s hygiene,
and that he was never alone with her. When M. was interviewed by CAS after the
abuse allegations were raised, she indicated that she was never alone with her
dad and was always with her mom.
[345]       Under s. 16(c) of the Divorce
Act, the court is required to consider whether the family violence is
directed toward the child or whether the child is directly or indirectly exposed
to the family violence.
[346]       The respondent alleges that the applicant’s
violence has been directed towards M. and also contend that M. has witnessed
violence. The follows are some of those reports:
[347]       The
court is satisfied that M. was present when the encounters took place between her
parents.
[348]       Under s. 16(d) of the Act, the
court is required to consider the physical, emotional, and
psychological harm or risk of harm to the child.
[349]       While
the fact that the parties are no longer together is an attenuating
circumstance, there is conduct on the part of the respondent which places M. at
risk of psychological harm. The respondent has ignored M.’s pediatrician about
not exposing M. to statements about the applicant. The respondent has ignored
the advice of the professionals, as discussed above. The respondent insists
that M. needs trauma informed therapy. She has exposed M. to adult situations,
and has, on the evidence, forced her to choose between her mother or her
father. The respondent has no insight on the emotional and psychological harm
being caused by her actions.
[350]       The
respondent does not acknowledge that she perpetrated any violence. However, the
professionals have defined what she is doing to M. as “child abuse.”  While the
respondent has told authorities and professionals that on several occasions she
witnessed the applicant’s sexual abuse of M., this is contrary to what she
initially stated to authorities. At the trial, she testified that she
experienced, as well as witnessed, the applicant’s abuse over the years. This
is inconsistent with what she has told authorities.
[351]       The
respondent has provided different dates for when she found out about the
alleged abuse of M. She initially indicated that she did not witness any
incidents of abuse; however, in the ensuing months, when the litigation was
underway, the respondent provided more and more details of abuse. Though she
now says that she witnessed the abuse, she has also said that M. disclosed her
experiences of abuse on January 4, 2022. On the contrary, in the respondent’s
trial affidavit, she deposed that on December 26, 2021, two days before the
applicant’s arrest, the applicant “woke me up at night by putting his hand
around my neck, squeezing my neck and whispering at me it was my fault for
what he was doing to M[xxx]”.
[352]       The
respondent deposed in her affidavit that on December 23, 2021, the applicant
hurt or injured M.’s ribs. She said that M. told her that “Dad made them hurt.”
She deposed that she lifted M.’s shirt and noticed redness on either side of
her ribs, which persisted. This account is different from the account given to the
police, wherein the respondent apparently told the police that M. was not able
to explain what happened to her, and that she lifted the shirt and did not notice
anything. The respondent told the police that she assumed it was the applicant who
was responsible. On cross-examination, the respondent could not explain the
discrepancy between the two accounts.
[353]       As
noted by Dr. Harris, if the respondent did witness repeated sexual abuse of her
daughter, this would implicate her in the alleged abuse for failing to protect
her child. The court agrees with Dr. Harris. Until the respondent has some
insight into how harmful the reality is that she has created, which the court
believes is to further her own goals of severing the M.’s relationship with her
father, then undoubtedly, the respondent’s ability to consider what is in the
best interest of M. will be severely impaired. For example, the respondent has
not addressed the long-term consequences for M. of having to reject her father in
the event of a therapeutic goodbye.
[354]       The
following are some of examples of the respondent’s conduct that has created a
harmful reality for M.:
[355]       The
court agrees with the applicant that the respondent’s allegations have resulted
in M. being subjected to multiple invasive interviews by CAS, the police, and
other authorities.
[356]       While s. 16(e) of
the Divorce Act instruct that the court shall consider any compromise to
the safety of the child or other family member. Although the respondent
repeatedly says that her actions are motivated by her concern for M.’s safety,
she has shown little regard for M.’s emotional wellbeing (for example, by
disputing with others in M.’s presence). In S. v. A., 2021 ONSC 5976, 61
R.F.L. (8th) 45, at para. 25, McGee J. indicated: “No conduct by a caregiving
parent that deliberately undermines a child’s sense of safety or self should be
sanctioned or permitted to continue.” In that case, at para. 26, McGee J. found
that the post-separation behaviour of the mother, which prevented the children
from having separate feelings from her own, threatening their sense of self and
security, constituted family violence.
[357]       Section 16(f) of the Act
instructs that the court consider whether the family violence causes the
child or other family member to fear for their own safety or for that of
another person. The respondent repeatedly says that she and M. are “terrified” of
the applicant. A safety plan was put in place to mitigate against any physical
or emotional harm to M. It was anticipated that with supervised visits, the
applicant could maintain contact with M., and the relationship would be monitored
to ensure safety. However, the respondent has disobeyed every court order. For
the sole supervised visit that did occur, M. warmed up to the applicant within
15 minutes after not seeing him for a year and a half. M. did not show any terror.
The various supervisors testified that when M. repeated the same statements
over and over again, she did not demonstrate that she was in distress.
[358]       Under s. 16(g) of the Act,
the court shall consider any steps taken by the individual engaged in family
violence to improve their ability to care for and meet the needs of the child. The
respondent says that she is in therapy. The applicant has taken part in the
Partner Assault Response Program and has worked with two therapists. Dr. Harris
indicated that the Caring Dad’s program is available for the parties.
[359]       Under s.16(h) of the Act, the
court shall consider any other
relevant factor. In this case, the court considers the applicant’s argument that
the respondent coached M. to make the sexual abuse allegations. The court also
consider his argument of parental alienation.
[360]       There is ample evidence to support the applicant’s position that the
respondent mother has been coaching M. to make statements and to resist
parenting visits. CAS indicated that there was coaching. Ms. Blakeley says
there were red flags, though she could not confirm coaching. M. has made
statements that are not consistent with what a child her age might say. A
number of professionals described M.’s demeanor when she was making a disclosure;
they noted that she was looking at her mother or not looking at the doctor and
that she was speaking without any affect, behaviours which suggest coaching. After
speaking with a professional, M. will run to her mother to snuggle up and tell
her she has told an individual a particular piece of information.
[361]       M.
was interviewed by several individuals to address the inconsistencies with the
interviews with respect to the allegations of sexual abuse. The CAS file noted
that “there are too many inconsistencies in M[xxx]’s interviews to be able to
verify allegations of sexual abuse.”  CAS’s findings are not binding on the
court.
[362]       The
court, on a balance of probabilities, finds that the respondent coached M. to
make statements to individuals with a duty to report, and thereafter,
reinforced the statements before supervising parenting visits with the
applicant or interviews with authorities. The court acknowledges the following evidence
that supports a finding of coaching:
[363]       Ms. Blakeley, M.’s treating therapist, also raised concerns about
coaching. At trial, she acknowledged commenting to Dr. Haroon that it was
possible that coaching was occurring and that it was also possible that
coaching had occurred, but she could not confirm or deny either possibility.
She stated: “I did say that it’s interesting that M[xxx] will tell Ms. Y[xxx],
her mother, very quickly after session, that she told me information that had
occurred between her and her father. She noted M. will bring up the abuse in
the last few minutes of as session and that she will then leave the session and
tell the respondent: “I told Jessica what dad did to me”, citing this is a red
flag for her.
[364]       At trial, Ms. Blakeley acknowledged that the applicant shared his
concerns that the respondent was coaching M., who is sharing things that
apparently happened when she was two or three years old. At trial, Ms. Blakeley
agreed with questioning that she shared the following with Dr. Harris:
[365]      
As part of her assessment, Dr. Harris reviewed the clinical notes and
records of M.’s pediatrician, Dr. Naya Rizk. Neither party challenged the
accuracy of Dr. Harris’ report as to the information contained in the notes.
Neither party called Dr. Rizk as a witness. The report indicates that M. was
seen for baby checks and was noted to be meeting her milestones. She was
periodically seen for cold symptoms, dermatitis, mild abdominal pain, and
vaccination.
[366]       In
April 2022, Dr. Rizk instructed the respondent not to expose M. to her stories
about the applicant. The evidence before the court indicates that the
respondent did not comply with the advice of the pediatrician.
[367]       On
August 23, 2022, the respondent raised concerns about M. being mistreated during
visits with the applicant. Dr. Rizk indicated that this was not likely, as the
visits were supervised.
[368]       On
M.’s next visits with Dr. Rizk in November 2022, Dr. Rizk noted that M. refused
to listen and answer questions.
[369]       At
a visit on March 16, 2023, M. made a disclosure of sexual abuse. Dr. Rizk
reported that M. made poor eye contact and faced her mom, rather than talking
directly to Dr. Rizk.
[370]      
The CAS records indicate that they did not verify sexual abuse, and the
respondent was provided with information to make a complaint. Ms. Boodram’s
notes for April 26, 2022, indicate:
[371]       Under
s. 16(1), the court must consider only the best interest of the child of the
marriage in making a parenting or contact order. Under s. 16(5), the court may
not consider the past conduct of a spouse unless the conduct is relevant to the
spouse’ ability to act in the child’s best interest.
[372]       In
this case, the respondent’s past conduct is relevant to any parenting order the
court may make. Her past conduct, post-separation, indicates that regardless of
any parenting order the court may make, she will not comply unless it is one
that completely eradicates the applicant and his family from M.’s life. The
court agrees with the applicant that the respondent has done everything she can
to “sabotage” his parenting visits, and in the court’s view, even to the point
of contumelious disobedience of court orders as appears from the evidence.
[373]       None
of the other judges before whom contempt motions were brought had a full
picture of the respondent’s actions. She has shown that she cannot be trusted
to put M.’s interest above her own and is prepared to play with M.’s
psychological and emotional well-being. Dr. Harris is of the view that the
respondent will continue to bring forward sexual abuse charges as long as there
is ongoing litigation between the parties. That the allegations were brought
about in the first place is of grave concern to the court because of the impact
on M. The allegations have warped her view of her relationship with her father.
The silver lining is that with court ordered therapy with Dr. Blakeley, M. is
functioning well. She must be given the opportunity to continue to function
well long-term.
[374]       Under s. 16(6) of
the Divorce Act, as amended, the court must give effect to the principle
that parenting time must be consistent with the child’s best interest. The
provision reads:
[375]       The
maximum contact principle does not mean equal parenting time: Rigillo v.
Rigillo, 2019 ONCA 647, 31 R.F.L. (8th) 361, at para. 13; Knapp v.
Knapp, 2021 ONCA 305, 155 O.R. (3d) 721. In Barendregt the
Supreme Court of Canada recently examined the “maximum contact principle,” and
the interpretation that implied that it meant as much contact with both parents
as possible, will necessarily be in the best interests of the child.
[376]       First,
the Court noted that Gordon required courts to consider “the
desirability of maximizing contact between the child and both parents”: at para.
49. In Gordon, the Supreme Court indicated that the “maximum contact”
principle was mandatory, but not absolute: at para. 24.  In Barendregt, Court
made clear that the primary focus is the best interest of the child, and the “maximum
contact principle” must not detract from that inquiry; parenting time under the
amended Divorce Act, per s. 16(6), must be consistent with the best interest
of the child.  At para. 135, speaking for the majority, Karakatsanis J. stated:
[377]       Each
case turns on its own unique circumstances. The only issue is the best
interests of the child in the specific circumstances of the case. Maximum
contact does not – and did not – necessarily mean equal contact: Young,
at pp. 44, 52. As noted by Karakatsanis J. in Barendregt, “if other
factors show that it would not be in the child’s best interests, the court can
and should restrict contact”: see also Gordon, at paras. 24, 49.
[378]       Of
relevance are a number of factors discussed above and below, including parental
alienation, and the evidence by the experts of the impact of the allegations of
sexual abuse has had on M. in the way that it has become her realty.
Additionally relevant is the evidence relating to the psychological and
emotional harm caused by asking M. to choose one parent over another, and the
extreme restrictive gatekeeping of M. identified by the experts, and
established, overwhelmingly, on the evidence.
[379]       As
discussed, the applicant contends that the respondent has coached M. and has
engaged in conduct to sabotage his parenting visits. In contrast, the
respondent contends that M. has disclosed repeated sexual abuse by the
applicant, which she herself has witnessed, and M. is afraid and terrified of
her father. She says that she is looking out for M.’s safety.
[380]       Dr.
Harris noted that there was “significant information pointing toward highly
restrictive gatekeeping by Ms. Y[xxx] which is itself harmful to children.” Dr.
Harris noted the “repeated unfounded allegations of child abuse, frequent
involvement of various authorities and systems due to repeated allegations of
harm perpetrated by Mr. Y[xxx], and parent-child contact problems.”  She noted
that “Gatekeeping by allegation is a parent alienating behaviour.”
[381]       Mr.
Wygant reviewed the research cited by Dr. Harris. The research showed that parental
alienation includes repeated unfounded allegations of child abuse, which,
according to the research poses a risk to the child, as the child is required
to undergo repeated investigations and may ultimately believe the allegations
to be real. There was no evidence at the trial as to whether the articles Mr.
Wygant referred to on this topic were authoritative and accepted in the field. Accordingly,
the court gives little weight to his opinion on this issue.
[382]       However,
the evidence before the court is that since M. was four and half years old, M.
has been interviewed by various authorities about the sexual abuse. Both Dr.
Harris and Ms. Blakeley have noted the impact on M. – this has become her
reality. M. has been interviewed three times by CAS, she has been interviewed
by the police, and she has been interviewed by CYAC; all of
these professionals concluded that they could not verify sexual abuse because
of the inconsistencies.
[383]       After the police declined to lay charges, the respondent brought
forward more allegations. After the police declined to interview M. again,
based on the police notes, which were also reviewed by Dr. Harris, the
respondent was “insistent” that M. provide a statement as she had spoken to her
“multiple” times about the incident. The alleged incident related to M. stating
that the applicant had hurt her neck while building a fort. In her report, Dr. Harris
noted:
[384]       Parental
alienation is destructive to the bonds between a parent and a child. It has
serious repercussions on the child’s emotional and psychological well-being,
and ultimately, their safety. In Ottewell v. Ottewell, 2012 ONSC
5201, at para. 58, McCarthy J. quoted the following passage of Mossip J. in Reeves
v. Reeves, [2001] O.J. No. 308 (Ont. S.C.J.), at para. 38, wherein
he refers to the impact of parental alienation on children, as gleaned from the
studies and the jurisprudence. Justice Mossip stated:
[385]       The
courts have taken into account the existence of parental alienation in making a
parenting order.
[386]       The
respondent has repeatedly blamed M. for the failed parenting visits with her
father. She argued that M. did not want to enter the supervising center,
because she was “afraid” and “terrified” of her father. Yet, M. had no
difficulty with the one successful visit where it was in the interest of the
respondent to have Dr. Harris complete her assessment. M. entered the building.
She had no issue with video time with her father. M. had no issue with an in-person
connection with her father, which occurred minutes later. At the end of that
one and only visit, sixteen months after separation, M. allowed the applicant to
assist her with putting on her winter gear at the end. It is worth underlining
that M. was between the ages of five and six when the parenting orders were
being made.
[387]       The
jurisprudence establishes that a parent cannot leave it up to the child to decide
whether there will be an interaction with the other parent, as this is both an abdication
of their parental responsibility and a breach of a parenting order. Godard
v. Godard, 2015 ONCA 568, 65 R.F.L. (7th) 265; Quaresma v.
Bathurst, 2008 CanLII 61241 (ON SC), at para. 8;
Campo v. Campo, 2015 ONSC 1349; and Stuyt v. Stuyt
(2009), 2009 CanLII 43948 (ON SC), 71 RFL (6th) 441 (Ont. S.C.J).
[388]       In
Godard, at para. 28, the Court of Appeal stated the obligation on
parents to ensure the children comply with parenting orders as follows:
[389]       In
Bors v. Bors, 2021 ONCA 513, 60 R.F.L. (8th) 36, the Ontario
Court of Appeal reiterated that a parent has a positive obligation to make sure
a child who is resisting contact complies with the access order. At para. 28,
the Court stated:
[390]       Just
as in Godard and Bors, similarly, in this case, the respondent is
in breach of the nine parenting orders. She failed to ensure that she and M. complied
with these nine orders.
[391]       At
the trial, the respondent referred to the endorsement of Sugunasiri J., dated February
9, 2023, dismissing the applicant’s contempt motion. In the court’s view, Sugunasiri
J.’s views were based on an incomplete record.  She did not have the benefit of
the CAS files, extensive supervising notes, or the s. 30 report of Dr. Haris.
In any event, the court is not bound by her factual findings made on an
interlocutory motion. To put her comments in context, Sugunasiri J.stated:
[392]       Dr. Harris indicated that there are signs pointing towards highly restrictive
gatekeeping. These signs existed before the parties separated, and in the
court’s view, may have been one of the reasons for the December 2021 conflict
between the parties. The applicant was concerned about M. sleeping during the
day and her isolation. M. is still being homeschooled. None of the respondent’s
friends who testified have ever met M. in person, even in the two plus years
after the parties separated. The babysitting protocol, or “Rules” for
babysitting, also points towards this gatekeeping. It is multiple pages and
addresses multiple areas: health, discipline, cleanliness, food and drink,
language, and learning, to name a few. An excerpt from the rules (redacted for
name) below, illustrates the level of gatekeeping:
[393]       Second,
having had the benefit of a full record and having heard oral evidence,
including from various staff who supervised visits at Brayden and Renew, there
is absolutely no doubt, on the evidence, that the respondent’s conduct was
deliberate and intentional and designed to frustrate and sabotage any parenting
time that the applicant was granted by nine court orders.
[394]       As
some of the testimony of the staff, Ms. Haroon, and Dr. Harris established, the
respondent would set out safety measures to be put in place but would then proceed
not to comply. Her behaviour was constant and flagrant, resulting in 51 aborted
parenting visits. After Czutrin J.’s order that she remain in her vehicle, she
engaged in an absolute refusal to co-operate with the Brayden team to consent
to them speaking with M.’s court-ordered therapist to facilitate visits. Around
the same time, she ensured that more charges were brought forward against the
applicant within months after the Crown withdrew the initial charges against
him.
[395]       In
Y.H.P. v. J.N., 2023 ONSC 5766, 94 R.F.L. (8th) 38, at
para. 31, Kraft J. noted that parental alienation has been described as the following:
[396]       In
A.M. v. C.H., the Court of Appeal accepted the trial judge’s conclusion
that parental alienation is a legal concept and not a mental health diagnosis.
In the result, the court could make a finding of alienation based upon an
analysis of the facts alone without expert evidence. At paras. 108-109 of the
trial judgment (Malhotra v. Henhoeffer, 2018 ONSC 6472), the court
distilled the factors recognized and accepted by the caselaw as constituting
parental alienation, based on the behaviour of the child and the alienating
parent. The factors are as follows:
[397]       After
analysis of the evidence, the court finds that, from the perspective of a
child, M. exhibits the following alienating behaviour:
[398]       As
for the respondent, the court finds that she exhibits the following alienating
behaviour:
[399]       As
noted, Dr. Harris identified the respondent’s gatekeeping by allegation, which
is a parent alienating behaviour. Dr. Harris summed up some of those instances,
which is just a sample, arriving at a similar conclusion. She concluded that
the respondent undermined the applicant’s parenting time over the course of 18
months, and did so in the following ways:
[400]       Therefore,
there is overwhelming evidence for the court to conclude, beyond a balance of
probabilities, that there was parental alienation in this case.
[401]       The chronology of events occurring on the CAS file, as shown in Appendix
C and incorporated by reference in this judgment, indicate that whenever the
file was closed, within days, weeks, or months, another referral was made which
would cause them to re-open their file. Indeed, the CAS worker, Ms.
Harry, testified that she told Dr. Harris that when they closed their file,
they would receive a new referral. She acknowledged that she conveyed to Dr.
Harris:
[402]       The
unfortunate conclusion to be drawn by the evidence, is that the respondent laid
charges and had M. make statements to individuals with a duty to disclose, so
that she could gain a tactical advantage in the litigation. Appendix C shows
this.
[403]       The
court accepts the applicant’s evidence as to the dispute between the parties
about M. Specifically, the court accepts his concern that she was sleeping
during the day, not getting enough sun, and was not in school.
[404]        When
the initial charges were brought in December 2021, the allegations were of
assaults alleged to have occurred beginning in 2008. Without diminishing the
seriousness of the any disputes, the parties were having over their daughter, it
appears the trigger for the police involvement related to the applicant’s
concern re: M., and his threat to contact CAS. The respondent admitted there
was no physical violence the day the police were called by her friend. She says
she had a discussion with her friend, Mr. Zagala, and it was decided that the
police should be called. According to Dr. Harris’ report, Mr. Zagala told her
he had contacted a friend of his, who was a police officer, “for support and
guidance as to what to do.” Mr. Zagala did not testify at trial and the only
use that the court can make of the statement is that it was made to Dr. Harris,
and it is not admissible for the truth of its content. It was Mr. Zagala who
called the police. Accordingly, there was no emergency when Mr. Zagala called
the police to have them come to the matrimonial home to arrest the applicant.
[405]       The
timing of the call to the police should be viewed as well, against the backdrop
of what was occurring in the weeks before. The court may consider whether the respondent’s
motive in having her friend called the police was to hold the applicant
criminally responsible for having assaulted her, or to gain an advantage in the
family law proceedings. In Marcellin v. London (Police Services Board),
2024 ONCA 468, van Rensburg J.A. noted, at para. 69:
[406]       In
this case, the respondent’s post-separation conduct, evidenced by the Chronology
at Appendix A, including the following: following up with the police in advance
of her court cases or afterwards; over 50 repeated allegations since December
2021 relating to abuse against herself; and the extensive allegations of sexual
assault allegations against M., which have not been substantiated by any
authority, yet she persists in repeatedly bringing new allegations. Having
regard to this conduct, and the nature of the dispute between the parties, it
is clear the respondent is advancing the complaints to affect the applicant’s ability
to seek a parenting order.
[407]       Section
16.1(1) of the amended Divorce Act gives the court authority to make an
order providing for the exercise of parenting time or decision-making
responsibility by either spouse. The parenting order may be for a definite or
indefinite period, and the court may impose any terms, conditions, and
restrictions it considers appropriate: Divorce Act, at. s. 16.1(5).
[408]       Both
parties rely on the options presented by Dr. Harris. The applicant is relying
on the “custody reversal,” as Dr. Harris called it, which is really a reversal
of primary residence of the child and decision-making responsibility. The respondent
is relying on the therapeutic goodbye.
[409]       Under
s. 2(1) of the Divorce Act, “Parenting time” is defined as time that a
child spends in the care of either parent, whether or not the child is
physically with that person during that entire time.
[410]       A
trial judge should not delegate parenting and decision-making authority to an
assessor:  Strobridge v. Strobridge, 1994 CanLII 875 (ON CA), 1994 ONCA 875, 18 O.R. (3d) 753; Behrens
v. Stoodley (1999), 1999 CanLII 1626 (ON CA), 3 R.F.L. (5th) 8 (Ont. C.A.). An assessor’s
recommendations are only one of the factors to be considered by the court in
making determination as to what is in the best interest of the child in making
a parenting order: Singer v. Davila-Singer (2003) 2003 CanLII 48471 (ON CA), 42 R.F.L. (5th)
202 (Ont. C.A.), at para. 6; D. v. D., 2021 ONSC 4963.
[411]       The
respondent has advocated for a therapeutic goodbye. Such an option would
involve the applicant and his daughter permanently saying goodbye to each
other. It is the only option that the respondent is prepared to entertain. This
option is opposed by the applicant father, who says it not only severs his
relationship from his six-year-old daughter but would also put an end to her
relationship with her paternal grandparents and extended family, as well as her
Chinese heritage.
[412]       The
respondent has not provided any authority, statutory or otherwise, for the
court to make an order for a therapeutic goodbye.
[413]       The
Supreme Court of Canada laid out the principles guiding access in Young,
at paras. 27 and 219:
[414]       In
Young, the Supreme Court noted that “the custodial parent has no “right”
to limit access”: at para. 219. The termination of parental rights is a remedy
of last resort. In C.A.S. v. C.F. and J.M., 2020 ONSC 3755, McGee
J. stated that “Access is the right of a child”: at para. 32. Access is only to
be ordered in circumstances where there will be a benefit to the child; parents
do not have an absolute “right” of access: Jennings v. Garrett, (2004) 2004 CanLII 17126 (ON SC), 5
R.F.L. (6th) 319 (Ont. S.C.J.).  Justice Blishen’s decision in Jennings is
widely cited in cases involving a request to terminate access (parenting
visits). He stated as follows:
[415]       The
caselaw establishes that supervised access is normally contemplated for before
termination is considered. In this case, the respondent thwarted any attempt
for supervised visits to take place, even when she showed up on time. Given the
court’s finding that the respondent is an alienating parent, the court is not convinced
that a therapeutic goodbye, which would permanently sever this child’s
relationship with her father, would be in M.’s best interest.
[416]       Dr.
Harris indicated that the second option available to this family in the
circumstances is a “custody reversal,” also known as a reversal of
decision-making and primary residence. Dr. Harris proposes a 90-day no contact
period between the respondent and child, and after, care therapy for all
parties involved.
[417]       When asked, the professionals testified that they have never been
involved in a case where there were so many failed parenting visits. While the
applicant proposes intensive reunification therapy, Ms. Haroon says reunification
therapy is not an option because the respondent will not agree to participate. Dr.
Harris says that there are no half measures in this this case; there are only the
two stark options. There is no doubt that the respondent will continue her alienating
actions to prevent M. from having any relationship with her father.
[418]       Moreover,
there is no doubt that M.’s removal from her mother’s care will be traumatic
and destabilizing in the short term. However, Dr. Harris indicated that “many
children with appropriate supports and when placed into the care of a stable
and loving adult can weather the disruption with resilience. Children can and
do survive and can have good outcomes following the loss of a parent.”
[419]       In
Nixon v. Hunter, (2009) 2009 CanLII 38785 (ON SC), 73 R.F.L. (6th) 391 (Ont. S.C.), at para.
42, Price J. outlines what a court’s reaction to parental alienation should be.
Justice Price stated:
[420]       In
M.P.M. v. A.L.M., 2021 ONCA 465, 157 O.R. (3d) 13, Thorburn J.A.,
speaking for the Court of Appeal commented:
[421]       In
M.P.M., at para. 36, the Court of Appeal indicated that the following
options are available to the court in these circumstances:
[422]       Where a reversal of decision-making and primary residence has been
ordered, the court may order that that the alienating parent have no contact
with the child for a minimum period: M.P.M., at para. 37; A.M. v. C.H.
[423]       A
reversal of decision-making and primary residence of a child may be appropriate
in various circumstances, including a parent’s failure to comply with court
orders and parental alienation: see Bors v. Bors, at para. 41; M.P.M.,
at para. 37.
[424]       Dr. Harris says that in this case, M. is likely to lose time with
one parent regardless of whether there is a custody reversal because she is not
confident that the respondent will successfully go through the intervention
program. She says that the literature suggests that although the child can connect
with the previously rejected parents, there are compliance issues with the
intervention by the previously favourite parents.
[425]       The court must look at this situation from the perspective of the
best interest of the child and not the parent. Dr. Harris testified that the
programs are “pretty successful” in reuniting children with their previously
alienated parent. She testified that the data is not strong with respect to
children having a relationship with both parents, but noted there is not much long-term
data for the programs.
[426]       When asked, all the professional witnesses and supervisors indicated
that the applicant has complied with all that has been required of him. Dr. Harris
says that she agrees with Ms. Haroon that “[the applicant] has shown very good
follow through with the different services and the judicial system that has
been involved and [the respondent] has shown much less ability to follow
through.” Elsewhere in her testimony, Dr. Harris indicated that there would
need to be court oversight when she suggested an option for third-party
facilitators for the communication of cultural information “because [the respondent]
has not demonstrated an ability to comply with service providers as it relates
to M[xxx]’s relationship with her dad.”
[427]       In this case, the best interest of M. is to have a relationship with
both her parents. She should have access to both her Chinese and Jamaican
heritage, and the opportunity to build a relationship with her paternal
grandparents. The respondent’s option would permanently sever all relationships
with her father and extended family. In the circumstances, removal from the
respondent’s care is in the best interest of M. and a period of no contact with
her mother is necessary to permit some movement towards reconciliation with her
father.
[428]       Dr. Harris testified at trial: “I have outlined why M[xxx] staying
with her mom is fraught with risks.” She says that “custody reversal” may have
“somewhat more risks in this context.” She says, “a custody reversal
destabilizes the family system, and it is a bit hard to predict the outcome,
and there may be unintended consequences.” However, Dr. Harris’ focus was on
the respondent, rather than the child. She believes that the respondent “is
quite fragile and is more fragile than dad and has a poor ability to cope and
navigate systems compared to Mr. Y[xxx].” She testified that she is not
confident that the respondent “would cope well with the custody reversal” and
indicated that “she is likely to make allegations and participate in creating
stress for M[xxx] in that regard.” In the court’s view, the consideration of
the respondent’s interest above the child would detract from the court’s
statutory duty, and the well-established body of law, to only take into
consideration the best interest of the child.
[429]       Dr. Harris herself has identified that there are child protection
issues raised by the respondent’s behaviour. She testified:
[430]       At the trial, the respondent was also focused on placing M. in
“trauma informed therapy.” Mr. Wygant testified that says putting a child in
trauma therapy who has not actually experienced abuse is itself abuse.
According to Ms. Blakeley, M. is functioning well. She thought M. was a typical
six-year-old and did not have details about her father.
[431]       All is not lost for the respondent’s relationship with her daughter.
The applicant has shown a willingness to have the respondent be a part of M.’s
life. She must now be intentional in ensuring that she maintains a healthy
relationship with her daughter. Dr. Harris acknowledged that if the respondent
were “able to comply, or participate actively, and support M[xxx] in having a
relationship with her father, yeah, then the outcome is expected to be better.”
[432]       Dr. Harris noted that parents who do well are those who are able to
take responsibility for their contributions to the parent/child contact
problems and complete the post reunification intervention. She stated that the
kids do “not typically go on to have good relationship with their favourite
parent, and it is typically because the favoured parent does not participate
effectively or adequately in the after care or the intervention program.”
[433]       The
court has considered the potential short- and long-term impact and disruption
to M. with a reversal of her primary residence. In doing so, the court has
considered M’s age, her successful visit with her father, and her attachment to
him before the separation. There are photos before the court of M. playing with
her dad and engaged in other activities with her dad. No doubt, in the short-term,
it will be difficult for M., given her strong attachment to her mother. Her
mother has been her only parent for the past three years.
[434]       M.
should have both parents in her life. However, to repair the father-daughter
relationship, a period is required where the child has no contact with the
respondent.
[435]       M.
has been made to fear leaving her mother and has been told her father abused
her. The alternative is to leave her in the care of a mother who is prepared to
fill her mind with hateful things about her father, isolate her from her peers,
and who is not prepared to consider the emotional impact that her own conduct
is having on her child.
[436]       On
the other hand, the applicant does not wish to have the respondent eradicated
from M.’s life. His wish was to arrive at a place where they could share
parenting and decision-making. Given the circumstances of this case, that is
not feasible, at least in the short-term. However, such a goal is not
impossible and will require all parties to have insight into how their
behaviour is impacting M.
[437]       This
family will require support to repair damaged relationships. The necessary
therapeutic support for the transition has started. M.’s treating therapist,
who remained neutral during the trial, is still prepared to work with her. However,
there are concerns raised by the fact that the respondent has repeatedly stated
that therapy for M. should be based on “a trauma informed approach.” The
professionals should dictate M.’s course of treatment.
[438]        There is insufficient evidence before the court as to what
other therapeutic intervention M. may require given her attachment to her
mother, the unique circumstances, her homeschooling, her exposure to the conflict
between her parents, and her development. However, the applicant has
demonstrated that he is much more likely to comply with doing what is in the
best interest of M. including involving Ms. Blakeley and Ms. Haroon. He has
complied with all court orders and directions from professionals, and even
though he denies the allegations of abuse, he has participated in recommended
programs and availed himself of therapeutic support, with the goal of
rebuilding his relationship with M.
[439]       The
professionals agree that the one and only supervised visit that the respondent
permitted to occur (so that the s. 30 assessment could be completed), was a
success. Surprisingly, M. had no problems going into the building that day nor did
she exhibit any resistance to meeting her father, first on Zoom, then in
person. She conversed with him. She allowed him to help her put on her coat.
She is, by all accounts, a smart child. The transition, perhaps, may be
tempered by the bond that she clearly still has with her father.
[440]       M. will have an opportunity to attend school, a point of contention
between the parties. Dr. Harris noted that it would be important for the child
to be in school. She was aware that M. was in a homeschool group, which was
once a month, and she did not consider this a program that children met
multiple afternoons in a week to be enough for M.’s socialization with peers.
On cross-examination, Dr. Harris noted that this was a separate issue from the
two options. She noted that she had had numerous conversations with the
respondent about the benefit of enrolling M. in school, and she noted that the
respondent spoke to her about enrolling M. in school “and yet that had not
unfolded.”
[441]       The
long-term impact of leaving M. with the respondent will mean she will continue
to find reasons to make allegations against the applicant to involve the police,
CAS, and other protective services. M. will be exposed to continuous conflict
between her parents, having to choose between her parents, and such a situation
can only be pernicious and dangerous to her emotional and even physical well-being.
The respondent has contaminated M.’s memory of events and undermined M.’s
treatment and therapy by speaking to her about the incidents when asked not do so.
[442]         The respondent will no doubt continue to impress upon the
professionals trying to assist M. that she should be treated based on a “trauma
informed approach.” Mr. Wygant indicated that the risk of psychological harm is
the induction that the child has been sexually abused when the child has not or
any professional participant that, when Mr. Wygant says to treat a child for
trauma when there has been no abuse, is abuse. This appears to be an obvious
point. In the court’s view, the status quo is far more detrimental to M.’s
long-term psychological and emotional well-being, and perhaps even her physical
well-being. In her report, Dr. Harris stated:
[443]        If
M. is to have a fighting chance of healing, developing normally as she gets
older, and growing into adolescence, the short-term upheaval to her in the
transition period is an unfortunate, but necessary requirement. In short, there
are foreseeable consequences of leaving M. with the respondent, who is content
to completely cut M. off from her father, his family, and, on the evidence, the
world at large, if she can.
[444]       The
applicant is prepared to work with Ms. Blakeley, who has indicated that she is
prepared to continue to work with M. Ms. Blakeley impressed the court as someone
who has not taken the side of either parent, and is focused on M.’s progress.
By all accounts, M. has a very good relationship with Ms. Blakeley.
[445]       On
the contrary, the respondent has placed roadblocks at every turn, and has
continued to expand on her allegations of family violence and sexual abuse of
M. She has not co-operated with professionals unless it benefited her. She has
not consented to release of records or signing documents, unless ordered by the
court. At times, it has taken multiple orders to get her to do so.
[446]       In
this extreme parent alienation case, the best interest of M. favours reversing
her primary residence and awarding sole decision-making responsibility to the
applicant father. Given the severity of the case, a period of five months of no
contact between M. and her mother is required. This amount of time may not even
be sufficient. It is not known whether the respondent mother will pursue appropriate
therapy so that she can share in parenting responsibilities with the applicant,
but that is a choice that she must make. At a minimum, a review of the
parenting order will be required to determine whether the respondent should be
afforded parenting visits after the five-month period, and if so, whether
conditions and restrictions ought to be placed on those visits. In the result,
some court supervision may be required.
[447]       Both
parties seek to impute income to the other.
[448]       The
respondent says that the applicant’s spending is not commensurate with his
income, and points to his contribution of $6,000 to his Tax-Free Savings
account in 2021, compared to his declared income. She says that the applicant
has income from other sources, including from independent contract work, mining
units, and cryptocurrency. She attributes the corporation’s income “entirely”
to the applicant and notes that the expenses in his Financial Statement, ending
in August 2022, was a total of $122,897.44, and not in line with his reported
income in 2022 of $43,239. The respondent says that she believes he has
additional income from mining units which generate between $5,000 to $7,500 USD
a month.
[449]       In
her draft order, the respondent attributes an income of $181,666 to the
applicant.
[450]       The
applicant submits that the respondent’s earning potential is well above
$100,000, as she used to earn well over $120,000 (potentially as high as
$150,000 with bonuses). The respondent has earned an excess of $100,000 a year.
He argues that she was running her own company, S[xxx], and her income is
unknown and unreported. Alternatively, the applicant argues that the respondent
is deliberately unemployed or underemployed. He asks that income be imputed to
the respondent in the amount of $60,000 and increased to $70,000 per year after
six months.
[451]       He
says she effectively quit her job by not showing up for work on a consistent
basis after her maternity leave ended, and was dismissed, ultimately reaching a
settlement.
[452]       Parties
have an ongoing obligation to support their children. The Ontario Court of
Appeal has noted that the imputation of income is one method whereby the court
gives effect to the joint and ongoing obligation of parents to support their
children. The court noted that a parent should earn what they are capable of
earning to meet their legal obligation: Drygala v. Pauli (2002),
2002 CanLII 41868 (ON CA), 61 O.R. (3d) 711 (Ont. C.A.), at para. 32.
[453]       The
test for imputing income for child support purposes applies equally for spousal
support purposes: Rilli v.
Rilli, 2006 CanLII 34451 (Ont. S.C.); Perino v. Perino
(2007), 2007 CanLII 46919 (ON SC), 46 R.F.L. (6th) 448 (Ont. S.C.).
[454]       The
regulatory mechanism for imputing income is found in s. 19(1) of the Federal
Child Support Guidelines, SOR/97-175. The court may impute income to a
spouse in such amount as it considers appropriate in the circumstances where,
for example, the court finds that the “the spouse is intentionally
under-employed or unemployed.”
[455]       The
onus is on the person seeking an imputation of income to establish a prima
facie case. The person requesting an imputation of income must establish an
evidentiary basis upon which this finding can be made: Homsi v. Zaya, 2009 ONCA 322, 65 R.F.L. (6th) 17, at para. 28; Drygala.
The onus then shifts to the payor to show that they acted reasonably, which must
be justified in a compelling way: see Riel v. Holland, (2003),
2003 CanLII 3433 (ON CA), 67 O.R. (3d) 417 (Ont. C.A.), at para. 23.
[456]       Intentional underemployment means a payor chooses to earn less than they
are capable of earning. The court need not find bad faith, or an intent to
evade support obligations. In determining whether to impute income on this
basis, the court must consider what is reasonable in the circumstances: Drygala,
at para. 45. There is no requirement of bad faith or an intention to evade
support obligations inherent in intentional underemployment: Lavie v. Lavie,
2018 ONCA 10, 8 R.F.L. (8th) 14, at para. 26; Drygala at paras. 24-37.
[457]       In Drygala, Gillese J.A., speaking for the court, defined the
meaning of “intentional underemployment” at para. 28:
[458]       The
imputation of income must be established on an evidentiary basis: Drygala,
at para. 44; Heard v. Heard, 2014 ONCA 196, at paras.
33-35. The amount selected must be grounded in the evidence: Drygala, at
para. 44. A three-part test is set out in Drygala, at para. 23, as follows:
[459]       The
factors to be considered include the payor’s age, education, experience,
skills, and health, as well as the payor’s past earning history, the payor’s
employment history, and the amount of income the payor could earn if they
worked to capacity: Lawson v. Lawson, (2006), 2006 CanLII 26573 (ON CA), 81 O.R. (3d) 321 (Ont. C.A.),
at para. 36; Drygala, at para. 45.
[460]       The
respondent has not established the evidentiary basis to impute additional income
to the applicant.
[461]        As
Myers J. stated in de Pimentel v. Rodriguez, 2024 ONSC
2844, at para. 18: “[i]ncome imputation must not be arbitrary. It is an
inference that must be grounded in admissible evidence adduced in the
proceeding.” The year before the parties separated, the applicant reported income
of $73,612. He has now reported income in the mid forty range.
[462]       Mr.
Krofchick indicated that in the years 2020 and 2021, the applicant’s company only
generated minimal profits. The applicant paid wages of $65,000 for 2020 and $40,300
for 2022. Mr. Krofchick’s report set out the applicant’s income for the
relevant tax years. After the separation, the applicant earned $74,613 in 2022 and
$40,000 in 2023. He says that there are several reasons for his decrease in
income.
[463]       First,
the applicant said that the respondent used to work in his business as well and
was paid a salary. He has now hired contractors to assist him. Second, he says
that the initial criminal charges have impacted his ability to get certain
contracts. Clients request criminal background checks. He has not been able to
expunge his record because of the respondent’s repeated allegations, resulting
in a new charge. He has lost clients. The applicant says the family law
proceedings and repeated false criminal allegations have had a significant
negative impact on his earning ability.
[464]       Based
on the nature of the business in the service industry, it is certainly reasonable
that his business would have been affected. A party is intentionally
underemployed where they earn less than they are capable or earning,
considering all the circumstances. Intentional underemployment excludes
situations that are beyond a party’s control: McBennett v. Danis, 2021
ONSC 3610, at para. 306; Ludwig v. Ludwig, 2022 ONSC 3359, at
para. 279.
[465]       The
applicant is not receiving monthly income from cryptocurrency, as the
respondent suggests; nor has the court been directed to such an income stream
reported in past years. Although the applicant admitted on cross-examination
that he did not disclose the mining unit and cryptocurrency to Mr. Krofchick,
it is not clear to the court what impact, if any, the mining units would have
on his income. Further, as Mr. Krofchick indicated, cryptocurrency is like
shares, and there is no evidence before the court of any disposition of the
units by the applicant. Accordingly, there is no evidentiary basis to impute
income to him from these investments.
[466]        As
for the applicant’s independent contract work, on cross-examination he testified
that it was for the period spanning 2015 to 2019. The income was modest.
[467]       The
respondent has also attempted to “pierce” the corporate veil. She says the
company and the applicant are one and the same, relying on a statement made by
Mr. Krofchick. Under s. 15 of the Business Corporations Act, R.S.O.
1990, c. B.16, a corporation has the capacity and the rights, powers, and
privileges of a natural person. A mirror provision exists in the federal
statute.
[468]       However,
mere control or ownership of a corporation is not sufficient to lift the
corporate veil: Transamerica Life Insurance Co. of Canada v. Canada Life
Assurance Co. (1996), 1996 CanLII 7979 (ON SC), 28 O.R. (3d) 423 (Gen. Div.), at pp. 433-34. Additionally,
there must be some element of fraud, improper purpose, or improper activity
which caused the plaintiff’s loss: see Aubin v. Petrone, 2020
ABCA 13, 100 Alta. L.R. (6th) 10, at paras. 23-26; Yaiguaje v. Chevron
Corporation, 2018 ONCA 472, 141 O.R. (3d) 1, at para. 70, leave to appeal
refused, [2018] S.C.C.A. No. 255. Mr. Krofchick was cross-examined extensively
by the respondent, and the court cannot conclude that there was fraud, or any conduct
by the applicant which would justify the lifting of the corporate veil, even to
do justice between the parties: see Kosmopoulos v. Constitution
Insurance Co. of Canada, 1987 CanLII 75 (SCC), [1987] 1 S.C.R. 2, at pp. 10-11.
[469]       The
applicant has a shareholder loan taken out. Mr. Krofchick indicated that if the
shareholder’s loan is not paid off within a year, the amount of the loan would
be included in the recipient’s income for the following year; that is to say,
it would be deemed income. Mr. Krofchick testified that by 2023, the applicant
had substantially paid off most of the loan.
[470]       The
court also finds no merit on the lifestyle argument. On cross-examination the
applicant admits that he has been paying off his monthly credit card
statements. Elsewhere in his evidence, when he was being cross-examined on his
financial statement, he indicated that he has been borrowing a lot of money
from his parents. In Bak v. Dobell (2007), 2007 ONCA 304 (CanLII), 86 O.R. 196, at
para. 143, Lang J.A., of the Ontario Court of Appeal, observed that “lifestyle
is not income, but rather evidence from which an inference may be drawn that
the payor has undisclosed income that may be imputed for the purpose of
determining child support.” In this case, the applicant has moved in with his
parents. As compared to the respondent, his standard of living has declined.
[471]       The
respondent has not met the onus of satisfying the court that there is an
evidentiary basis for imputing income to the respondent beyond what he has declared.
[472]       The
court finds that the applicant has established, on the evidentiary record, that
at a minimum, the income should be imputed to the respondent in the amount of $60,000
for the purpose of determining child and spousal support; the respondent has
not rebutted the presumption, for the reasons which follow.
[473]        The
respondent is in her early 40s, is in good health, and has a university degree.
There is no actual evidence of what she was earning in her previous career. She
has a solid track record of being employed in high-level managerial positions.
She admits that she is smart and has experienced academic and professional
success. She deposed: “Prior to July 2016, [the applicant] prevented my
attendance at work using violence, control, and destruction of property.”
[474]       However,
the respondent was in the work force after graduating from university and even
after M. was born. She was last employed outside the home in 2018, a year after
M. was born, as a Manager for Regulatory Affairs. She was with the company for
three years. Her resume indicates that she worked for the applicant’s company since.
Even though she has remained at home to homeschool M., she has declared income in
2020, 2021, and 2022.
[475]        Based
on the evidence before the court, the job demanded a great deal of
responsibility. She managed her own team and was responsible for developing
strategies for health and medical care products, implementing risk avoidance
strategies, and ensuring international audits were completed.
[476]       The
court rejects the respondent’s argument that the applicant prevented her from
returning to work except for her maternity leave. Rather, it appears to be her hypervigilance
towards her daughter, or as noted by Dr. Harris, extreme restrictive gatekeeping,
that has caused the respondent to be home.
[477]       The
respondent did return to work after her maternity leave. She said that there
was an agreement with employer that she could work from home. She deposed that
she lost her job due to restructuring. Her evidence that the applicant wanted
her to work from home so he could monitor her full-time is not plausible,
because he had his own company and was not on site to monitor her. She denied
the applicant’s suggestion that she was terminated for not showing up at work,
but on cross-examination indicated that there was a non-disclosure agreement
with her last employer. The non-disclosure agreement is, at minimum, indicative
that there was a settlement. The respondent refused to disclose the reason for
her departure from her employment and blamed the applicant in part. The
applicant contends that she was terminated and sued the company, resulting in a
settlement.
[478]       As
she is currently homeschooling M., this would certainly prevent her from
returning to the workforce. However, it is not necessary for M. to be homeschooled.
In fact, the respondent told CAS and Dr. Harris that she would be registering
M. to attend school. She provided contradictory evidence of her intention to
enroll M. in public school. Her trial affidavit indicated that she intends to
continue homeschooling M. because it fits her “profile,” but she also indicated
that she “explored” enrolling M. in school. The respondent has not provided any
actual evidence that she attempted to register M. in either Catholic or public
school; an alleged notice from the school that not all students can be accommodated
due to residential growth is not sufficient.
[479]       Even
while homeschooling M., the respondent’s income for 2020 was above $60,000. There
is a duty on the parties to maintain or actively seek out reasonable
income-earning opportunities which will maximize their earning potential: McBennett,
at para. 306; Ludwig, at para. 279.
[480]       M.’s
primary residence will be with the applicant father.
[481]      The
respondent mother shall pay child support in the amount of $556 based on an
imputed income of $60,000 per year pursuant, to ss. 18 and 19 of the Federal
Child Support Guidelines, to be reviewed annually in accordance with the
disclosure requirements under the Child Support Guidelines.
[482]       However,
the applicant has underpaid child support for 2022 and 2023 and up to the date
of judgement. He has been paying child support in the amount of $396.96 per
month, based on his 2022 Notice of Assessment income of $43,239, since May 1,
2023. Mr. Krofchick determined his income to be $74,613 in 2022, which would
result in Table Child Support of $697 a month, which would decrease to $359 a
month in 2023, based on his annual income of $40,000 a year, as determined by
Mr. Krofchick.  In the result, the court has concluded that the applicant
should have paid child support in the amount of $15,905 up the date of judgment,
based on the following:
[483]       The
applicant has been paying child support of $43,239 in the amount of $396.96 per
month, based on the order of Kristjanson J., from May 1, 2023. This would
result in a total amount paid of $7,145.28 to the date of judgment (18 months),
potentially resulting in a shortfall of $8,757.77 for child support.
[484]       The
parties shall pay their proportionate share for special and extraordinary expenses
for M. equally, and to be reviewed on April 1, 2025.
[485]       Unless
otherwise agreed to by the parties, special and extraordinary expenses shall be
limited to out of pocket expenses for dental, medical, and therapeutic
expenses, as well as tuition and other educational expenses. The party seeking
reimbursement shall furnish the necessary supporting documentation.
[486]        The
respondent and the child, M., currently reside in the matrimonial home. The
applicant has had no access to the home since the day after he was arrested. As
indicated above, he continues to pay various carrying costs associated with the
home.
[487]       The
applicant seeks an order for partition and sale of the property, and the
repayment of $100,000, grossed up to $225,000, which he says was really a loan
from his parents for the downpayment. The respondent submits that the money was
a gift from the applicant’s parents and there was no expectation of repayment.
[488]       The
respondent is seeking exclusive possession of the home.
[489]       For
the reasons below, the claim advanced on behalf of the parents is dismissed,
and there shall be an order directing the sale of the matrimonial home.
[490]       At
the trial, the applicant’s mother acknowledged signing documents which indicate
the money was a gift. The court finds that the money advanced by the
applicant’s mother towards the downpayment on the matrimonial home was intended
to be a gift. In the result, the applicant’s parents have no interest in the
matrimonial home.
[491]       The
parties jointly own the matrimonial home.
[492]         The applicant is asking that the
property be sold under the Partition Act,
R.S.O. 1990, c. P.4. The court is satisfied that this is an appropriate case
for partition and sale.
[493]       As
a joint tenant, the applicant is a “person interested in land” pursuant
to s. 3(1) of
the Partition Act. Section 2 of
the Partition Act states
that a joint tenant or tenants in common may be compelled to make or suffer
partition or sale. The general approach to determining when partition or sale
should be granted was laid down in Davis v. Davis, 1953 CanLII 148 (ON CA), [1954] O.R. 23 (Ont.
C.A.), where the Court of Appeal stated:
[494]        The right to partition and sale can only
be refused in exceptional circumstances where the opposing party has
established that there has been malicious, vexatious, or oppressive
conduct: Silva v. Silva (1990), 1990 CanLII 6718 (ON CA), 1 O.R. (3d) 436
(Ont. C.A.), at para. 15; Greenbanktree
Power Corp. v. Coinamatic Canada Inc. (2004) 2004 CanLII 48652 (ON CA), 75 O.R. (3d)
478 (Ont. C.A.). The applicant, as a joint owner, has not been in the property
for more than two and half years. He has remained away from the home, save for
the day after his arrest when he returned to obtain his belongings with the
police present. The respondent says that he did not sign renewal documents in
time which would have allowed the mortgage to go in default. The court accepts
the applicant’s explanation at trial. However, this does not rise to the level
of malicious, vexatious, or oppressive conduct that would be required on the
part of the applicant.
[495]       Section
5 of the Family Law Act provides for the equalization of net family
properties (“NFP”) upon marriage breakdown.
[496]       The
parties disagree on the amount of equalization payment to be paid, and by whom.
[497]       The
applicant says the respondent owes him an equalization payment of $131,444.93.
[498]       The
respondent says the applicant owes her an equalization payment of $226,174.87.
[499]       There
are significant discrepancies between the two NFP statements, discussed below.
[500]       One
of the major discrepancies between the two NFP statements is the value of the
matrimonial home (though that valuation is neutral). The discrepancy is
$100,000 apart, but neutral at the end, in terms of the impact on the
calculation of the net family property, as both sides attributed the same
amount for notional disposition of the property.
[501]       The
respondent includes a valuation of $440,000 for cryptocurrency. The applicant
says that the value is approximately $15,000. Mr. Krofchick agreed that the applicant
did not disclose income from cryptocurrency. However, as noted, Mr. Krofchick testified
that the cryptocurrency was considered stock and was “highly volatile.” Absent
any evidentiary foundation, the court cannot accept the respondent’s speculation
on the value of the cryptocurrency. The speculation by the respondent that the
applicant would have been contributing speculated amounts, for start dates
unknown, for a speculative value, cannot be accepted by the court.
[502]       The
court has disallowed the deduction as excluded property of $100,000 grossed up
to $225,000, said to be a gift from the applicant’s parents towards the
downpayment of the matrimonial home, given my finding above.
[503]       The
respondent includes a value of $75,000 for the applicant’s vehicle, which
appears to be the purchase price in Canadian dollars from 2018, which was when
the vehicle was purchased. The applicant refers to the “Book value,” without
providing a figure. Vehicles generally depreciate, and there is no supporting
information before the court to substantiate that value. The book value ranges
between $15,000 to $25,000. Accordingly, the court has assigned a value of
$20,000, which is the midpoint.
[504]       Similarly,
the applicant has attributed a value of $9,435 for the respondent’s 2011
vehicle, whereas the respondent estimates the value to be in the amount of $5,000.
The court finds the respondent’s estimate to be more reasonable. The entire
amount has been allocated to the respondent who is in possession of the
vehicle.
[505]       The
applicant includes the value of household goods and furniture, sports
equipment, jewelry, and electronics as totaling approximately $42,000, which he
attributes solely to the respondent; however, the respondent notes a value of
zero. The court has allowed $20,000 attributable to the respondent for this
item.
[506]       The
applicant indicates in his NFP statement that the value of the respondent’s
business is “unknown.” The respondent does not include any valuation in her
statement, but instead added her company for the valuation figure provided by
Mr. Krofchick for the applicant’s business. She allocates the valuation to the
applicant only. The respondent takes the position that the company was a
subsidiary of the applicant’s company. Therefore, there is no evidence before
the court on the value of the business.
[507]       According
to my calculation, the court finds that the respondent owes the applicant an equalization
payment of $100,327.47. My calculations are provided with the release of this decision
but is not attached as an Appendix.
[508]       Neither
party addressed the issue of spousal support in their submissions, nor
established a basis for entitlement to spousal support. The respondent’s draft
submission listed it as an issue, and her draft order included a provision for retroactive
and ongoing support for herself in the amount of $2,095, commencing January 1,
2022, based on an imputed income to the applicant of least $181,666, under the Spousal
Support Advisory Guidelines (“SSAG”).
[509]       For
the reasons below, the court dismisses the respondent’s claim for spousal
support.
[510]       The
respondent has not addressed the threshold question of entitlement. Entitlement
can be based on compensatory, non-compensatory, or contractual grounds: see Bracklow
v. Bracklow, 1999 CanLII 715 (SCC), [1999] 1 S.C.R. 420. While entitlement based on a need can
be found in cases where there is a significant income disparity at the time of
the initial application, on the evidence before the court, there was no
significant income disparity at the time the application was commenced.
[511]       The
respondent’s standard of living has remained the same while the applicant has
moved in with his parents; on the evidence, he has experienced a decline in his
standard of living. The court accepts the applicant’s evidence that because of
the criminal charges, his ability to procure clients has been impacted due to
the background checks. In cases where a spouse maintains a similar standard of
living to that which they enjoyed before separation, there is no basis for a
needs-based, non-compensatory claim for support: see McIntyre v. Winter,
2020 ONSC 4376; Lamothe v. Lamothe, 2006 CanLII 42360 (ON SC), 35 R.F.L. (6th) 148.
[512]       On its own, a mere disparity of income that would generate an amount
under the SSAG does not automatically lead to entitlement, although
a disparity of income may lead to a finding that there is an economic hardship
arising from the breakdown of the marriage: see Lee v. Lee, 2014 BCCA
383, 64 B.C.L.R. (5th) 313; R.L. v. L.A.B., 2013 PESC 24, 342 Nfld.
& P.E.I.R. 220; Berger v. Berger, 2016 ONCA 884, 85 R.F.L. (7th) 259.
[513]       The parties jointly filed their taxes before they separated. There is
no indication that applicant ever earned even close to half of $181,666. The
company had little profit in 2020 and 2021. The applicant’s income $73,612 for
2020, $42,300 for 2021, and $43,239 for 2022.
[514]       On the other hand, the respondent’s income was $63,194 for 2020, $72
for 2021, and $34,471 for 2022. It is also noteworthy that on her NFP
statement, the respondent included a valuation for the cosmetic company, which
the applicant said she earns an unknown income from.
[515]       In the court’s view, apart from entitlement, neither party established,
on a balance of probabilities, that either of them have suffered an economic
disadvantage because of the marriage, or that there was significant income
disparity at the time of the initial application. Both parties are well
educated and have had successful careers. The applicant has a business, but
there is no significant income disparity between the two parties because of it.
The applicant has also raised the issue of the costly battles due to the
criminal charges levied against him (all withdrawn, except the last charge
brought forward in September 2023) and the toll it has had on his business.
[516]       The respondent has a duty to be self-supporting. She has chosen to stay
home to homeschool M., and it appears, despite telling professionals otherwise,
that she intends to continue doing so into the indefinite future. There is
evidence to indicate that the applicant has supported the respondent working
outside the home, including providing her with listings for jobs, which belies
her arguments that he wanted her to remain at home.
[517]       In
his reply pleading, dated June 19, 2023, the applicant raised the claim for
occupation rent. He indicated that he would agree to pay retroactive child
support as long as he was reimbursed for all occupancy and use charges he claimed
and for occupancy rent.
[518]       A
claim for occupation rent must be reasonable and need not be exceptional: Non
Chhom v. Green, 2023 ONCA 692, 97 R.F.L. (8th) 83, at para. 8;
Griffiths v. Zambosco (2001), 2001 CanLII 24097 (ON CA), 54 O.R. (3d) 397 (Ont. C.A.).
[519]       A
claim for occupation rent is reasonable in the circumstances of this case. The
parties jointly own the property. The applicant has not had any access to the
property since the day he was arrested. There is significant equity in the
property, which the applicant has not been able to utilize. He has borrowed
from his parents to help finance the legal proceedings.
[520]       The
respondent has had exclusive possession of the property since December 28,
2021. However, the applicant has continued to pay maintenance on the property.
The applicant continued to pay for all utilities, water, hydro, property taxes,
water heater rental, car insurance for both vehicles, home insurance, and 50
percent of the mortgage payments, to the date of an interim order for costs on
May 1, 2023, by Kristjanson J. To that date, the applicant estimated the amount
to be approximately $54,562.19. Beyond that date, the figures are unknown. There
is no evidence as before me of the expenses paid by the respondent or the
rental value, among other things.
[521]        The
respondent acknowledges that the applicant has contributed to the expenses of
the matrimonial home, including the hydro, gas, water, and heat, among other
things. She also acknowledges that the applicant only started to pay what she
calls “formal child support” in May 2023.
[522]       The
respondent says that the applicant has not contributed to M.’s section 7
expenses. It is not clear to the court what the section 7 expenses are. There is
a shortfall of $8,757.77 for child support owed to the respondent.
[523]       In
the absence of any calculation by either party as to the amount owing for
occupation rent, the amount of and the amount owing for section 7 expenses,
these amounts may be set off against each other, as it would be unconscionable
for the applicant to pay the shortfall in the circumstances. It is not disputed
by the respondent that the applicant has continued to pay her car insurance,
half the mortgage, taxes, utilities, and expenses associated with the
matrimonial home. Accordingly, any shortfall is addressed under the
post-separation adjustment below.
[524]       The
applicant did not seek a divorce in his initial application on the basis that
he did not want the marriage to end. The respondent sought a divorce in her
Answer. I am satisfied that there is no chance of reconciliation, and that the
parties have established a legal basis for a divorce to be granted, having
lived separate and apart for two years. The respondent does not contest the relief
sought for a divorce.
[525]        I
would have been inclined to grant the divorce, but no Affidavit for Divorce (Form
36) was provided, nor did any party provide the necessary information mandated
by r. 36(4) of the Family Law Rules, namely the filing of a marriage
certificate or marriage registration certificate and a Clearance Certificate.
[526]       Accordingly,
the applicant may file the necessary documents to apply for an uncontested
divorce. Service of the application is dispensed with.
[527]       The
following is the court’s:
[528]       The
applicant, G.Y., may file the necessary affidavit and information contemplated
by r. 36(5) (i.e., Marriage Certificate and Divorce Certificate) and the
necessary draft divorce order contemplated by r. 36(6). Service on the respondent,
C.Y., is dispensed with.
[529]      
For the reasons above, I
make the following order:
[530]       If
the parties, through their respective agents, are not able to agree on costs, the
court will consider written submissions, limited to 5 pages, and any supporting
affidavit, if necessary, the last mentioned limited to three pages, double
spaced, twelve-point font, and a Bill of Costs, based on the following
schedule:
[531]       The
Costs submissions should be forwarded to the Trial Co-Ordinator.
[532]       Approval
of the draft judgment by the respondent, C.Y., is dispensed with if the
applicant prepares the order for signing. The applicant shall advise the court
within five days of the date of this judgment if he intends to do so; otherwise,
and if not, the clerk shall prepare the order for signature within 10 days of
the date of this judgment.